Florida, session 2026, SB318.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 251 252 Section 1.âSection 1011.687, Florida Statutes, is created 253 to read: 254 1011.687âEducational scholarship programs; categorical 255 fund.â 256 (1)âThere is created a categorical fund for implementing 257 the Family Empowerment Scholarship Program pursuant to s. 258 1002.394. These funds shall be in the amount provided in the 259 General Appropriations Act and any additional funds transferred 260 from the educational enrollment stabilization program pursuant 261 to s. 1011.689. 262 (2)âEducational scholarship funding categorical funds shall 263 be used to award scholarships as required in s. 1002.394 and in 264 accordance with s. 1002.421. Funds shall be disbursed from this 265 fund based on the full-time equivalent scholarship students 266 forecasted or reported as participating in the program. 267 (3)âA âfull-time equivalent studentâ for a student 268 participating in a scholarship program under s. 1002.394 or s. 269 1002.395 means a student who receives all 10 scholarship 270 payments that are distributed on a monthly basis. A student who 271 receives fewer than 10 payments shall generate a fraction of 272 full-time equivalent student membership proportional to the 273 number of payments received. 274 (4)âFor the purposes of calculating a scholarship award 275 amount, a full-time equivalent student shall be based upon the 276 studentâs county of residence and equal to the calculation 277 provided under s. 1002.421(5)(a). 278 (5)âContingent upon verification that the organization is 279 in compliance with this section and ss. 1002.421, 1002.394, and 280 1002.395, the department shall release funds from the 281 categorical fund on a quarterly basis to the organization. The 282 funds shall be held by the organization for deposit into the 283 studentsâ accounts in accordance with the payment schedules and 284 may not include any funding for scholarship awards for any time 285 preceding a studentâs verified eligibility for or acceptance of 286 a scholarship. 287 (a)âThe first quarter release payment to the organization 288 shall be based upon the amount of full-time equivalent students 289 forecasted as provided in the General Appropriations Act and in 290 an amount sufficient to make scholarship payments through the 291 third payment installment. The first quarter release payment 292 must be released no later than July 30. 293 (b)âThe second quarter release payment to the organization 294 shall be based upon the amount of full-time equivalent students 295 cross-checked by the department pursuant to s. 1002.421(3) and 296 in an amount sufficient to make scholarship payments through the 297 fifth payment installment. The second quarter release payment 298 must be released no later than November 1. 299 (c)âThe third quarter release payment to the organization 300 shall be based upon the amount of full-time equivalent students 301 cross-checked by the department pursuant to s. 1002.421(3) and 302 in an amount sufficient to make scholarship payments through the 303 eighth payment installment. The third quarter release payment 304 must be released no later than January 1. 305 (d)âThe fourth quarter release payment to the organization 306 shall be based upon the amount of full-time equivalent students 307 cross-checked by the department pursuant to s. 1002.421(3) and 308 in an amount sufficient to make scholarship payments through the 309 tenth payment installment. The fourth quarter release payment 310 must be released no later than April 1. 311 (6)âIf the funds released to the organization are in excess 312 of the funds certified to the department by the organization as 313 the amount distributed for student scholarships in accordance 314 with scholarship program requirements, the organization must 315 send back to the department any overpayment within 30 days of 316 certification to the department. The department may not adjust 317 the amount of any overpayment in the second, third, or fourth 318 quarter payment release and must account for each payment back 319 from the organization separately. 320 (7)âThe department shall have access to the organizationâs 321 data and records as necessary to conduct a reconciliation of 322 releases and overpayments to the organization. 323 Section 2.âSection 1011.689, Florida Statutes, is created 324 to read: 325 1011.689âEducational enrollment stabilization program.âThe 326 educational enrollment stabilization program is created to 327 provide supplemental state funds as needed to address changes in 328 full-time equivalent student enrollment throughout the school 329 year in both the Florida Education Finance Program and the 330 educational scholarship programs created pursuant to chapter 331 1002. 332 (1)âSCHOOL DISTRICT STABILIZATION.âTo maintain the 333 stability of the operations of public schools, including charter 334 schools, in each school district, the department: 335 (a)âMay use funds in either of the following ways: 336 1.âTo distribute to school districts if the state funds 337 appropriated for the current operation of school districts in 338 the Florida Education Finance Program are not sufficient to pay 339 the state requirement in full pursuant to s. 1011.62(15). 340 2.âTo provide supplemental payments to school districts as 341 needed. Any supplemental funds provided pursuant to this 342 subparagraph may not be added to the districtâs total Florida 343 Education Finance Program funds for any future calculation. 344 (b)âShall use funds as appropriated to provide a 345 supplemental payment to school districts that have a decline in 346 unweighted full-time equivalent students between the legislative 347 calculation provided in the General Appropriations Act and the 348 third calculation of the Florida Education Finance Program 349 within the same year. The supplemental payment shall be computed 350 by multiplying a percentage of the decline in the unweighted 351 full-time equivalent students as determined by the Legislature 352 by the base student allocation and by the comparable wage factor 353 or the small district factor. The percentage used for districts 354 that are fiscally constrained must be greater than the 355 percentage used for non-fiscally constrained districts. The 356 supplemental funds may not be added to the districtâs total 357 Florida Education Finance Program funds for any future 358 calculations. 359 (2)âFAMILY EMPOWERMENT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM.âTo maintain 360 scholarship award amounts, the department may use funds as 361 appropriated to ensure that funding is available if the number 362 of full-time equivalent students enrolled in the scholarship 363 program is greater than the amount appropriated in the General 364 Appropriations Act in the educational scholarship categorical 365 fund established under s. 1011.687. 366 (3)âFLORIDA TAX CREDIT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM.âIf available 367 funds in the Florida Tax Credit Scholarship Program are 368 insufficient to cover eligible applicants who are personalized 369 education program students, the department may use funds to 370 award scholarships to such eligible applicants up to the number 371 authorized in s. 1002.395. 372 (4)âRELEASE OF FUNDS.âAs part of the recalculation pursuant 373 to s. 1011.65, the department may request the release of funds 374 from the educational enrollment stabilization program subject to 375 the notice, review, and objection procedures set forth in s. 376 216.177. 377 (5)âMINIMUM BALANCE.âThe Legislature shall annually 378 appropriate funds in the General Appropriations Act to the 379 department for the educational enrollment stabilization program 380 in an amount necessary to maintain a projected minimum balance 381 of $250 million at the beginning of the upcoming fiscal year. 382 Notwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351, the 383 unexpended balance of funds appropriated pursuant to this 384 subsection which is not disbursed by June 30 of the fiscal year 385 in which the funds are appropriated may be carried forward for 386 up to 10 years after the effective date of the original 387 appropriation. 388 Section 3.âSection 1002.40, Florida Statutes, is amended to 389 read: 390 1002.40âThe Hope Scholarship Program.â 391 (1)âPURPOSE.âThe Hope Scholarship Program is established to 392 provide the parent of a public school student who was subjected 393 to an incident listed in subsection (3) an opportunity to 394 transfer the student to another public school or to request a 395 scholarship for the student to enroll in and attend an eligible 396 private school. 397 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 398 (a)ââParentâ means a resident of this state who is a 399 parent, as defined in s. 1000.21, and whose student reported an 400 incident in accordance with subsection (4). 401 (b)ââProgramâ means the Hope Scholarship Program. 402 (c)ââSchoolâ means any educational program or activity 403 conducted by a public K-12 educational institution, any school 404 related or school-sponsored program or activity, and riding on a 405 school bus, as defined in s. 1006.25(1), including waiting at a 406 school bus stop. 407 (3)âPROGRAM ELIGIBILITY.âA student enrolled in a Florida 408 public school in kindergarten through grade 12 is eligible for 409 the educational options described in subsection (4) if the 410 student reported an incident in accordance with that subsection. 411 For purposes of this section, the term âincidentâ means battery; 412 harassment; hazing; bullying; kidnapping; physical attack; 413 robbery; sexual offenses, harassment, assault, or battery; 414 threat or intimidation; or fighting at school, as defined by the 415 department in accordance with s. 1006.09(6). 416 (4)âSCHOOL DISTRICT OBLIGATIONS; PARENTAL OPTIONS.âUpon 417 receipt of a report of an incident, the school principal, or his 418 or her designee, shall provide a copy of the report to the 419 parent and investigate the incident to determine if the incident 420 must be reported as required by s. 1006.09(6). Within 24 hours 421 after receipt of the report, the principal or his or her 422 designee shall provide a copy of the report to the parent of the 423 alleged offender and to the superintendent. Upon conclusion of 424 the investigation or within 15 days after the incident was 425 reported, whichever occurs first, the school district shall 426 notify the parent of the program, offer the parent an 427 opportunity to enroll his or her student in another public 428 school that has capacity, and notify the parent of their 429 eligibility to apply for a scholarship to attend an eligible 430 private school under ss. 1002.394 and 1002.395. 431 (5)âRULES.âThe State Board of Education shall adopt rules 432 to administer this section. 433 Section 4.âSection 1002.421, Florida Statutes, is amended 434 to read: 435 1002.421âState school choice scholarship programs program 436 accountability and oversight.â 437 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, s. 1002.394, and 438 s. 1002.395, the term: 439 (a)ââApproved providerâ means a provider approved by the 440 Agency for Persons with Disabilities, a health care practitioner 441 as defined in s. 456.001, or a provider approved by the 442 department pursuant to s. 1002.66. 443 (b)ââChoice navigatorâ means an individual who meets the 444 requirements of s. 1002.395(6)(d)8. and who provides 445 consultations, at a mutually agreed upon location, on the 446 selection of, application for, and enrollment in educational 447 options addressing the academic needs of a student; curriculum 448 selection; and advice on career and postsecondary education 449 opportunities. However, this section does not authorize a choice 450 navigator to oversee or exercise control over the curricula or 451 academic programs of a personalized education program. 452 (c)ââCurriculumâ means a complete course of study for a 453 particular content area or grade level, including any required 454 supplemental materials and associated online instruction. 455 (d)ââDisabilityâ means, for a 3- or 4-year-old child or for 456 a student in kindergarten to grade 12, autism spectrum disorder 457 as defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 458 Disorders, Fifth Edition, published by the American Psychiatric 459 Association; cerebral palsy as defined in s. 393.063; Down 460 syndrome as defined in s. 393.063; an intellectual disability as 461 defined in s. 393.063; a speech impairment; a language 462 impairment; an orthopedic impairment; any other health 463 impairment; an emotional or a behavioral disability; a specific 464 learning disability, including, but not limited to, dyslexia, 465 dyscalculia, or developmental aphasia; Phelan-McDermid syndrome 466 as defined in s. 393.063; Prader-Willi syndrome as defined in s. 467 393.063; spina bifida as defined in s. 393.063; being a high 468 risk child as defined in s. 393.063(23)(a); muscular dystrophy; 469 Williams syndrome; rare diseases that affect patient populations 470 of fewer than 200,000 individuals in the United States, as 471 defined by the National Organization for Rare Disorders; 472 anaphylaxis; a hearing impairment, including deafness; a visual 473 impairment, including blindness; a traumatic brain injury; being 474 hospital-bound or homebound; or identification as dual sensory 475 impaired, as defined by rules of the State Board of Education 476 and evidenced by reports from local school districts. The term 477 âhospital-bound or homeboundâ includes a student who has a 478 medically diagnosed physical or psychiatric condition or 479 illness, as defined by the state board in rule, and who is 480 confined to the home or hospital for more than 6 months. 481 (e)ââEligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organizationâ 482 or âorganizationâ means a state university or an independent 483 college or university that is eligible to participate in the 484 William L. Boyd, IV, Effective Access to Student Education Grant 485 Program; is located and chartered in this state; is not for 486 profit; is accredited by the Commission on Colleges of the 487 Southern Association of Colleges and Schools; or is a charitable 488 organization that: 489 1.âIs exempt from federal income tax pursuant to s. 490 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; 491 2.âIs a Florida entity formed under chapter 605, chapter 492 607, or chapter 617 and whose principal office is located in 493 this state; and 494 3.âComplies with s. 1002.395(6) and (13). 495 (f)ââEligible postsecondary educational institutionâ means 496 a Florida College System institution; a state university; a 497 school district technical center; a school district adult 498 general education center; an independent college or university 499 that is eligible to participate in the William L. Boyd, IV, 500 Effective Access to Student Education Grant Program under s. 501 1009.89; or an accredited independent postsecondary educational 502 institution as defined in s. 1005.02 which is licensed to 503 operate in this state under part III of chapter 1005 or is 504 approved to participate in a reciprocity agreement as defined in 505 s. 1000.35(2). 506 (g)ââEligible private schoolâ means a private school as 507 defined in s. 1002.01 which is located in Florida and which 508 offers an education to students in any grades K-12 and meets the 509 requirements in this section. 510 (h)ââFraudâ means an intentional deception, omission, or 511 misrepresentation made by a person with knowledge that the 512 deception, omission, or misrepresentation may result in an 513 unauthorized benefit to that person or another person, or any 514 aiding and abetting of the commission of such an act. 515 (i)ââHousehold incomeâ has the same meaning as the term 516 âincomeâ as defined in the Income Eligibility Guidelines for 517 free and reduced price meals under the National School Lunch 518 Program in 7 C.F.R. part 210 as published in the Federal 519 Register by the United States Department of Agriculture. 520 (j)ââIEPâ means an individual education plan, regardless of 521 whether the plan has been reviewed or revised within the last 12 522 months. 523 (k)ââInactiveâ means that no eligible expenditures have 524 been made from an account. 525 (l)ââJob coachâ means an individual employed to help people 526 with disabilities learn, accommodate to, and perform their work 527 duties. 528 (m)ââLaw enforcement officerâ has the same meaning as 529 provided in s. 943.10(1). 530 (n)ââOwner or operatorâ includes: 531 1.âAn owner, a president, an officer, or a director of an 532 eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization or a person 533 with equivalent decisionmaking authority over an eligible 534 nonprofit scholarship-funding organization; or 535 2.âAn owner, an operator, a superintendent, or a principal 536 of an eligible private school or a person with equivalent 537 decisionmaking authority over an eligible private school. 538 (o)ââParentâ means a resident of this state who is a parent 539 as defined in s. 1000.21. 540 (p)ââPersonalized education programâ has the same meaning 541 as in s. 1002.01. 542 (q)ââPersonalized education studentâ means a student whose 543 parent applies to an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 544 organization for participation in a personalized education 545 program. 546 (r)ââRenewal studentâ means a student who was eligible to 547 receive and received a payment for the last installment in the 548 school year immediately preceding the school year for which the 549 student is applying for a scholarship pursuant to this chapter. 550 (s)ââStudent learning planâ means a customized learning 551 plan developed by a parent at least annually to guide 552 instruction for his or her student and to identify the goods and 553 services needed to address the academic needs of his or her 554 student. 555 (2)âSCHOLARSHIP APPLICATION PROCESS.â 556 (a)âAn eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization 557 must provide the parent with information on each scholarship 558 program established pursuant to this chapter which clearly 559 outlines the eligibility requirements and authorized uses of 560 funds for each program to enable the parent of a student to 561 determine which program best fits the needs of each student. 562 Specifically, for a student applying based on eligibility 563 pursuant to s. 1002.394(3)(b) or s. 1002.395, except for 564 students eligible pursuant to a personalized education program, 565 a participating private school must discuss the schoolâs 566 academic programs and policies, specialized services, code of 567 conduct, and attendance policies before enrollment with the 568 parent to determine which programs and services may meet the 569 studentâs individual needs. Each parent of a student with an 570 individualized education plan, education plan, English language 571 learner plan, or 504 plan must be informed specifically of what 572 modifications, accommodations, and therapies included in the 573 studentâs plan will be honored by the participating private 574 school. 575 (b)âThe organization must create a single application for 576 all educational scholarship programs established pursuant to 577 this chapter in a manner that creates an electronic record of 578 the application, which must include the date the application was 579 submitted, the date the application was approved or denied, and 580 the date the scholarship was accepted or declined. The 581 organization may not charge a fee for the application. 582 (c)âFor the 2026-2027 school year and each school year 583 thereafter, the organization must establish two application 584 approval windows each school year during which a parent of an 585 eligible student, including renewal students, may apply for and 586 accept an educational scholarship program pursuant to this 587 chapter, except for personalized education students, who may 588 only apply during the fall application approval window. 589 1.âThe application approval window for the fall scholarship 590 term must close no later than July 15. The fall scholarship term 591 covers the period between August 15 and December 31 of each 592 year. The fall application window may not begin any earlier than 593 February 1 of the preceding school year. A parent initially 594 applying for the fall term must affirmatively accept the 595 scholarship between June 15 and July 15. 596 2.âThe application approval window for the spring 597 scholarship term must close no later than November 15. The 598 spring scholarship term covers the period between January 1 and 599 May 31 of each year. A parent initially applying for the spring 600 term must affirmatively accept the scholarship between October 601 15 and November 15. 602 3.âA failure to accept the scholarship between the 603 applicable approval window results in an automatic declination 604 of the scholarship. 605 4.âA parent of a student who is provided funds during the 606 fall scholarship term does not need to reapply for the spring 607 scholarship term. 608 (d)âAn organization must review applications and award 609 scholarships using the following priorities: 610 1.âAn application for a student who is eligible pursuant to 611 s. 1002.394(3)(a) or s. 1002.395 and: 612 a.âWhose household income level does not exceed 185 percent 613 of the federal poverty level or who is in foster care or out-of 614 home care; and then 615 b.âWhose household income level exceeds 185 percent of the 616 federal poverty level but does not exceed 400 percent of the 617 federal poverty level. 618 2.âAn application for a student who is eligible and 619 received a scholarship during the previous school year. 620 3.âAn application for a student who was affected by the 621 disapproval of an organizationâs participation by the department 622 pursuant to s. 1002.395 during the previous school year. 623 624 The organization must provide scholarships to newly eligible 625 students on a first-come, first-served basis unless the student 626 is seeking priority pursuant to this paragraph. 627 (e)âA parent of a student who applies for and receives 628 scholarship funds initially for the spring scholarship term may 629 only receive 5 of the 10 payment installments for the school 630 year. 631 (f)âA parent may not apply for multiple scholarships under 632 s. 1002.394 or s. 1002.395 for an individual student at the same 633 time. However, the organization may switch a student between 634 scholarships under s. 1002.394 or s. 1002.395 upon notification 635 and approval by the department. 636 (g)âNotwithstanding the application deadlines, a student in 637 foster care or out-of-home care or who is a dependent child of a 638 member of the United States Armed Forces or who reported an 639 incident pursuant to s. 1002.40 may apply for a scholarship at 640 any time. Additionally, the Commissioner of Education may extend 641 an application window for any eligible group of students due to 642 extenuating circumstances that affect one or more regions of 643 this state. However, any student receiving a scholarship who 644 applies outside the application deadlines may only receive 645 payments prospectively. 646 (h)âAn organization may not restrict or reserve 647 scholarships for use at a particular eligible private school or 648 provide scholarships to a child of an owner or operator as 649 defined in subparagraph (1)(n)1. Additionally, the organization 650 must notify each parent of a scholarship applicant that 651 participation in the scholarship program does not guarantee 652 enrollment at an eligible private school. 653 (i)âFor the 2026-2027 school year, a parent who applies for 654 a scholarship by April 30, 2026, does not need to submit a new 655 application pursuant to the requirements of this section but 656 must, by the time the organization is required to send its 657 verified list to the department, provide the documentation 658 required for eligibility. However, a parent may withdraw his or 659 her application and reapply pursuant to the requirements of this 660 section. This paragraph expires January 1, 2027. 661 662 An eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization may not 663 further regulate, exercise control over, or require 664 documentation beyond the requirements of the scholarship 665 programs unless the regulation, control, or documentation is 666 necessary for participation in the program. 667 (3)âENROLLMENT VERIFICATION.âUpon receipt of an 668 application, the eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 669 organization must verify each studentâs eligibility. Each 670 student, including renewal students, must apply for a 671 scholarship each school year. An organization may not grant 672 multiyear scholarships in one approval process. 673 (a)âTo verify eligibility, the organization must request 674 all of the following information for each student, to be 675 included in the studentâs file: 676 1.âMore than one form of proof of residency or proof that 677 the student is the dependent of an active duty member of the 678 United States Armed Forces who has received permanent change of 679 station orders to this state. 680 2.âA copy of the studentâs birth certificate or other 681 documentation as specified in s. 1003.21(4), the name on which 682 must be identical to the name provided on the studentâs 683 application. 684 3.âFor a student who was enrolled in a public school prior 685 to participation in the scholarship program as determined by the 686 department, proof that the parent submitted the standard 687 withdrawal form to the public school where the student was 688 previously enrolled or, if the withdrawal occurred prior to the 689 creation of the standard withdrawal form, another form of proof 690 of withdrawal from the public school. 691 4.âOne of the following forms of documentation from the 692 parent attesting that while the student receives scholarship 693 payments, the student will be enrolled in and in compliance with 694 the applicable attendance requirements under ss. 1003.01(16) and 695 1003.21(1): 696 a.âA copy of the notice of a parentâs intent to establish 697 and maintain a home education program pursuant to s. 1002.41; 698 b.âA personalized education program and a copy of the 699 student learning plan that has been reviewed and verified by the 700 organization pursuant to s. 1002.395(7)(c); or 701 c.âDocumentation of admission or enrollment from a private 702 school for the school year in which the student is applying. 703 5.âIf known, the studentâs Florida student identification 704 number if one has been assigned. 705 (b)âIn addition, if the student: 706 1.âIs a renewal student, the organization must: 707 a.âRequest for each student the assessment results 708 necessary to verify compliance with subsection (7). The deadline 709 for a parent to submit the results is July 15. 710 b.âReceive documentation from the parent attesting that the 711 student will continue to meet all eligibility requirements for 712 the scholarship. 713 c.âVerify that all documents required for eligibility have 714 been received and are on file. 715 d.âIf the student lives out of state and is a dependent of 716 an active duty member of the United States Armed Forces, receive 717 documentation that the home of record or state of legal 718 residence is Florida. 719 2.âIs seeking priority eligibility based upon household 720 income, the parent of the student must authorize the 721 organization to access information needed for income eligibility 722 determination and verification held by other state or federal 723 agencies, including the Department of Revenue, the Department of 724 Children and Families, the Department of Education, the 725 Department of Commerce, and the Agency for Health Care 726 Administration. 727 (c)âAn organization must send to the department a list of 728 eligible students and any information necessary for the 729 department to conduct the following cross-check reviews by: 730 1.âAugust 1 for the fall scholarship term. 731 2.âOctober 1 for the fall scholarship mid-term. 732 3.âDecember 1 for the spring scholarship term. 733 4.âMarch 1 for the spring scholarship mid-term. 734 735 For the spring scholarship term, the organization must submit 736 students initially applying for the scholarship during the 737 spring term, as well as all students who received a scholarship 738 payment within the fall term. Additionally, the organization 739 must update each list with any eligible student who applies 740 outside of the application deadlines pursuant to paragraph 741 (2)(g). 742 (d)âThe department must verify each studentâs Florida 743 student identification number or, if a student has not been 744 assigned a Florida student identification number, assign each 745 eligible student a Florida student identification number. Once a 746 student is assigned a Florida student identification number, the 747 organization must use that number for the reporting and tracking 748 of all scholarship data. 749 (e)âThe department must cross-check each list of eligible 750 students submitted by the organization with the most recent 751 student attendance records maintained by the school districts 752 pursuant to s. 1003.23 to resolve student reporting duplication. 753 1.âAs part of each cross-check process, the department must 754 send a list of the eligible students submitted by the 755 organization to the applicable school district. The school 756 district must cross-check each student by identification number 757 with its most recent student attendance records and send the 758 results, including any duplicates, to the department. Pursuant 759 to s. 1002.44, a student receiving a scholarship under this 760 chapter who attends a public school on a part-time basis through 761 contracted services provided by the public school or school 762 district may not be reported by the school district for funding 763 purposes under the Florida Education Finance Program, and, 764 therefore, such students are not considered duplicates. 765 2.âFor any student reported as a duplicate by a school 766 district, the department must determine whether the student is 767 prohibited from receiving a scholarship award pursuant to s. 768 1002.394(6) or s. 1002.395(4). As part of the departmentâs 769 determination process, the department must require the 770 organization to suspend payments to the studentâs account and 771 the use of funds in the studentâs account related to any period 772 of time the student is ineligible. 773 3.âThe department, after making its determination, shall 774 notify the district if there is any student reported by the 775 district as a duplicate whom the district should not report for 776 funding in the student membership survey pursuant to s. 1011.62. 777 For the students the district does report, the district shall 778 receive the full funding generated in accordance with the 779 Florida Education Finance Program, regardless of whether the 780 student received a scholarship payment, subject to the audit 781 required under s. 1010.305. 782 (f)âThe department, after the list of eligible students has 783 been cross-checked and each student has been assigned a Florida 784 student identification number, shall send the list of verified 785 eligible students to the organization, which may then fund 786 students only based upon the departmentâs list of verified 787 eligible students. The department must notify an organization of 788 any of the organizationâs identified students who were submitted 789 for a scholarship from another organization and which 790 organization the student shall receive funding from. 791 (g)âAfter each cross-check, the department must provide the 792 list of verified eligible students submitted to the organization 793 and any information on duplicate students requested to the chair 794 of the Senate Appropriations Committee, the chair of the House 795 Budget Committee, and the Office of Policy and Budget within the 796 Executive Office of the Governor. 797 (4)âPREPAYMENT VERIFICATION.âPrior to the disbursement of 798 each scholarship payment, the organization must verify the 799 studentâs continued eligibility based upon the requirements of 800 the applicable studentâs scholarship program. 801 (a)âFor scholarship programs that require private school 802 enrollment, the organization must verify that the student is 803 enrolled in and in attendance at a participating eligible 804 private school. 805 (b)âPrior to the receipt of each scholarship payment, a 806 parent of the student must attest that the student is not 807 enrolled full-time in a public school and is enrolled in 808 attendance at, unless excused for illness or other good cause 809 one of the following: 810 1.âA home education program; 811 2.âA personalized education program; or 812 3.âA private school. 813 (c)âThe parent of a student whose scholarship funds are 814 required under paragraph (6)(b) to be committed for tuition and 815 fees at a participating private school may authorize the private 816 school to provide the attestation required under paragraph (b) 817 on behalf of the parent by attesting that the student is 818 enrolled in and in attendance at the private school. The private 819 school and the organization must maintain records of the 820 parental authorization, and such authorization must be renewed 821 each school year. An improper attestation may be investigated as 822 fraud pursuant to subparagraph (10)(a)6., and the private school 823 may be liable to the state for payments made in violation of 824 this subsection and, if found liable, must reimburse the state 825 for funds improperly paid to the private school. 826 (d)âThe organization may not make any payment into a 827 studentâs account prior to a parentâs acceptance of a 828 scholarship award, upon notification that the student is 829 enrolled in a public school unless the organization can verify 830 the studentâs eligibility, or for any period of time prior to a 831 studentâs eligibility is verified by the department. An 832 organization is liable to the state for payments made in 833 violation of this subsection and must reimburse the state for 834 funds that were improperly awarded which cannot be recovered. 835 (5)âSCHOLARSHIP AWARD AMOUNTS AND PAYMENT SCHEDULE.â 836 (a)âBeginning in the 2026-2027 school year, the calculated 837 scholarship program award amounts shall be the amounts provided 838 in the General Appropriations Act which are based upon the 839 amounts by basic program and program for exceptional students 840 under the Florida Education Finance Program. These amounts shall 841 be adjusted annually based upon the value of the percentage 842 change increase in per student funding at the state level for 843 public school districts as provided in the General 844 Appropriations Act. 845 1.âThe calculated scholarship amount for a student 846 determined eligible pursuant to s. 1002.394(3)(a) or s. 1002.395 847 shall be based upon the studentâs current grade level and county 848 of residence. 849 2.âThe calculated scholarship amount for a student 850 determined eligible pursuant to s. 1002.394(3)(b) must be based 851 upon the studentâs current grade level, exceptional student 852 program, and county of residence. 853 a.âThe calculated scholarship amount for a student who 854 received a Gardiner Scholarship pursuant to former s. 1002.385 855 in the 2020-2021 school year shall be the greater of the amount 856 calculated pursuant to this subsection or the amount the student 857 received for the 2020-2021 school year. 858 b.âThe calculated scholarship amount for a student who 859 received a John M. McKay Scholarship pursuant to former s. 860 1002.39 in the 2020-2021 school year shall be the greater of the 861 amount calculated pursuant to this subsection or the amount the 862 student received for the 2020-2021 school year. 863 (b)âBeginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the 864 scholarship award shall be divided into 10 equal installments 865 and made in accordance with the prepayment verification process. 866 1.âFor a renewal student receiving a scholarship award 867 pursuant to s. 1002.394(3)(a) or s. 1002.395, and whose funds 868 are applied to tuition at an eligible private school that has 869 agreed to attest to the studentâs attendance pursuant to 870 paragraph (4)(c), the organization may make the first payment no 871 earlier than August 15 and the second payment no earlier than 872 September 15. 873 2.âFor all other students receiving scholarship awards, the 874 organization may make the first payment no earlier than 875 September 15. The first payment pursuant to this subparagraph is 876 for two installments. 877 3.âEach subsequent payment must be made no later than 878 October 15, November 15, December 15, January 15, February 15, 879 March 15, April 15, and May 15 of each school year in which the 880 scholarship is in force. 881 (6)âSCHOLARSHIP ACCOUNTS.âThe organization must establish 882 and maintain a separate scholarship account for each student 883 enrolled in a scholarship program. For each account, the 884 organization must maintain a record of accrued interest which is 885 retained in the studentâs account. Accrued interest in the 886 studentâs account is in addition to, and not part of, the 887 awarded funds. Program funds include both the awarded funds and 888 accrued interest and are available only for authorized program 889 expenditures. 890 (a)âPayment of the scholarship by the organization shall be 891 by funds transfer, including, but not limited to, debit cards, 892 electronic payment cards, or any means of payment the department 893 deems commercially viable or cost-effective. A studentâs 894 scholarship award may not be reduced to cover debit card or 895 electronic payment fees. Commodities or services related to the 896 development of such transfer system must be procured by 897 competitive solicitation unless purchased from a state term 898 contract pursuant to s. 287.056. 899 (b)âFor students eligible pursuant to s. 1002.394(3)(a) or 900 s. 1002.395, except for those students enrolled in a 901 personalized education program: 902 1.âThe organization must commit scholarship funds on behalf 903 of the student for tuition and fees that the parent must pay at 904 a participating private school before scholarship account funds 905 may be used for additional authorized uses under s. 906 1002.394(4)(a) or s. 1002.395(4)(d). A parent is responsible for 907 all eligible expenses in excess of the scholarship amount. An 908 organization shall ensure that the parent has approved a funds 909 transfer before any scholarship funds are deposited. The parent 910 may not designate any entity or individual associated with a 911 participating private school as the parentâs attorney in fact to 912 approve a funds transfer. 913 2.âAfter funds have been committed pursuant to subparagraph 914 1., funds may be used as authorized in s. 1002.394(4)(a) and as 915 authorized in the organizationâs purchasing handbook by paying 916 for the authorized use directly and then submitting a 917 reimbursement request to the organization. An organization may 918 require the use of an online platform for direct purchases of 919 products if such use does not limit a parentâs choice of 920 curriculum or academic programs. If a parent purchases a product 921 identical to one offered by an organizationâs online platform 922 for a lower price, the organization must reimburse the parent 923 the cost of the product. 924 3.âThe initial payment shall be made after the 925 organizationâs verification of admission acceptance, and 926 subsequent payments shall be made upon verification of continued 927 enrollment and attendance at a participating private school. 928 Payments for tuition and fees for full-time enrollment shall be 929 made within 7 business days after approval by the parent and the 930 private school. 931 4.âIf a student unenrolls from a participating private 932 school within 10 business days after enrolling in the private 933 school, the private school must return a proportional share of 934 the studentâs scholarship payment to the organization. 935 5.âAn organization may not transfer any funds to an account 936 of a student which has a balance in excess of $24,000. 937 (c)âFor students eligible pursuant to s. 1002.394(3)(b): 938 1.âThe organization must verify qualifying educational 939 expenditures pursuant to the requirements of s. 1002.394(4)(b). 940 The organization must verify any expenditures made pursuant to 941 s. 1002.394(4)(b)1. and 2. before the distribution of funds. 942 Review of expenditures made for services specified in s. 943 1002.394(4)(b)3.-16. may be completed after the purchase is 944 made. 945 2.âThe organization must develop a process, for 946 implementation beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, that 947 provides the commitment of scholarship funds on behalf of the 948 student for tuition and fees that a parent must pay at the 949 Florida Virtual School as a private-pay student before 950 scholarship account funds may be used for additional authorized 951 uses under s. 1002.394(4)(b) or s. 1002.395(6)(d). 952 3.âAn organization may not transfer any funds to an account 953 of a student which has a balance in excess of $50,000. 954 (d)âA parent of a student attending a public school on a 955 part-time basis through contracted services provided by a public 956 school or school district pursuant to s. 1002.44 must notify the 957 public school or school district in writing at the time of 958 application or at any subsequent time if the student is 959 receiving a scholarship. For such contracted services, the 960 public school may require the parent to pay for the contracted 961 services as authorized in ss. 1002.395(4)(a)6., 962 1002.395(4)(b)8., and 1002.395(6)(d)4.f. 963 (e)âA parent of a 3- or 4-year-old child receiving a 964 scholarship pursuant to s. 1002.394(3)(b) and receiving services 965 at a public school or school district must notify the public 966 school or school district in writing at the time of application 967 or at any subsequent time if the student is receiving a 968 scholarship. 969 (f)âThe parent of a student who fails to comply with this 970 subsection forfeits the scholarship. An organization must notify 971 the parent when a scholarship account is closed and when program 972 funds revert to the state or organization, as applicable. 973 (7)âTESTING REQUIREMENTS.âA student participating in a 974 scholarship program in grades 3 through 10 may take the 975 nationally norm-referenced tests that are identified by the 976 department or take the statewide assessments pursuant to s. 977 1008.22. Students with disabilities for whom standardized 978 testing is not appropriate and who are granted an extraordinary 979 exemption from the administration of the assessment pursuant to 980 s. 1008.212 are exempt from this requirement. 981 (a)âA participating private school must annually administer 982 or make provision for students participating in the program in 983 grades 3 through 10 to take one of the nationally norm 984 referenced tests or cooperate with a student whose parent 985 chooses to participate in the statewide assessments pursuant to 986 s. 1008.22. A parent must require his or her student 987 participating in the program to take the norm-referenced tests 988 offered by the participating private school. The parent may also 989 choose to have the student participate in the statewide 990 assessments pursuant to s. 1008.22. 991 (b)1.âIf the participating private school chooses to offer 992 and administer the statewide assessments pursuant to s. 1008.22 993 to all students who attend the private school in grades 3 994 through 10, it must submit a request in writing to the 995 department by March 1 of each year in order to administer the 996 statewide assessments in the subsequent school year. In turn, 997 upon the request of the department, a school district shall 998 coordinate with the department to provide to a participating 999 private school the statewide assessments and any related 1000 materials for administering the assessments. 1001 2.âA school district is responsible for administering tests 1002 at a participating private school, including: 1003 a.âProviding training for private school staff on test 1004 security and assessment administration procedures; 1005 b.âDistributing testing materials to a private school; 1006 c.âRetrieving testing materials from a private school; 1007 d.âProviding the required format for a private school to 1008 submit information to the district for test administration and 1009 enrollment purposes; and 1010 e.âProviding any required assistance, monitoring, or 1011 investigation related to administering tests and assessments at 1012 a private school. 1013 3.âA participating private school shall report a studentâs 1014 scores to his or her parent. By August 15 of each year, a 1015 participating private school must report the scores of all 1016 participating students to a state university as described in s. 1017 1002.395(9)(b)3. 1018 4.âIf a parent requests that the student participating in 1019 the program take statewide assessments pursuant to s. 1008.22 1020 and the participating private school has not chosen to offer and 1021 administer the statewide assessments, the district in which the 1022 participating private school is located must provide locations 1023 and times for the student to take the assessments. The parent is 1024 responsible for transporting the student to the assessment site 1025 designated by the school district. 1026 5.âFor students determined eligible pursuant to s. 1027 1002.395(7)(b), an organization must receive eligible student 1028 test scores, and beginning with the 2027-2028 school year, by 1029 August 15, annually report test scores for such students to a 1030 state university pursuant to s. 1002.395(9)(b)3. 1031 (8)âBACKGROUND SCREENING REQUIREMENTS.â 1032 (a)âEach owner or operator or an individual providing 1033 services under s. 1002.394(4)(b)4. or s. 1002.395(6)(d)4. 1034 through an organizationâs online platform for direct purchase 1035 pursuant to subparagraph (6)(b)2., prior to employment or 1036 engagement to provide services, must undergo a background 1037 screening and meet the screening standards in s. 1012.315. All 1038 fingerprints submitted to the Department of Law Enforcement as 1039 required by this section must be retained in the Care Provider 1040 Background Screening Clearinghouse as provided in s. 435.12. The 1041 cost of the background screening may be borne by the owner or 1042 operator or service provider. 1043 1.âEmployees, contracted personnel, owners, and operators 1044 must be rescreened as required by s. 435.12. 1045 2.âEmployees, contracted personnel, owners, and operators 1046 who apply for employment are governed by the laws and rules in 1047 effect at the time of the application for employment, provided 1048 that the person is continually employed by the same school or 1049 provider. An owner or operator who fails the level 2 background 1050 screening is not eligible to participate in a scholarship 1051 program under this chapter. 1052 3.âService providers who have been screened under licensure 1053 requirements in chapter 402, or who are exempt from licensure, 1054 are not required to be rescreened under this section. The 1055 Department of Education and the Department of Children and 1056 Families must implement a process to electronically share 1057 background screening results for such service providers. 1058 4.âIn addition to the offenses listed in s. 435.04, a 1059 person required to undergo background screening pursuant to this 1060 section or authorizing statutes may not have an arrest awaiting 1061 final disposition for, must not have been found guilty of, or 1062 entered a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of 1063 adjudication, and must not have been adjudicated delinquent for, 1064 and the record must not have been sealed or expunged for, any of 1065 the following offenses or any similar offense of another 1066 jurisdiction: 1067 a.âAny authorizing statutes, if the offense was a felony. 1068 b.âThis chapter, if the offense was a felony. 1069 c.âSection 409.920, relating to Medicaid provider fraud. 1070 d.âSection 409.9201, relating to Medicaid fraud. 1071 e.âSection 741.28, relating to domestic violence. 1072 f.âSection 817.034, relating to fraudulent acts through 1073 mail, wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or 1074 photooptical systems. 1075 g.âSection 817.234, relating to false and fraudulent 1076 insurance claims. 1077 h.âSection 817.505, relating to patient brokering. 1078 i.âSection 817.568, relating to criminal use of personal 1079 identification information. 1080 j.âSection 817.60, relating to obtaining a credit card 1081 through fraudulent means. 1082 k.âSection 817.61, relating to fraudulent use of credit 1083 cards, if the offense was a felony. 1084 l.âSection 831.01, relating to forgery. 1085 m.âSection 831.02, relating to uttering forged instruments. 1086 n.âSection 831.07, relating to forging bank bills, checks, 1087 drafts, or promissory notes. 1088 o.âSection 831.09, relating to uttering forged bank bills, 1089 checks, drafts, or promissory notes. 1090 p.âSection 831.30, relating to fraud in obtaining medicinal 1091 drugs. 1092 q.âSection 831.31, relating to the sale, manufacture, 1093 delivery, or possession with the intent to sell, manufacture, or 1094 deliver any counterfeit controlled substance, if the offense was 1095 a felony. 1096 5.âAt least 30 calendar days before a transfer of ownership 1097 of a private school, the owner or operator shall notify the 1098 parent of each scholarship student. 1099 6.âThe owner or operator of a private school that has been 1100 deemed ineligible to participate in a scholarship program 1101 pursuant to this chapter may not transfer ownership or 1102 management authority of the school to a relative in order to 1103 participate in a scholarship program as the same school or a new 1104 school. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term ârelativeâ 1105 means father, mother, son, daughter, grandfather, grandmother, 1106 brother, sister, uncle, aunt, cousin, nephew, niece, husband, 1107 wife, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, 1108 brother-in-law, sister-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepson, 1109 stepdaughter, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, or half 1110 sister. 1111 (b)âAn organization must report the annual audit of 1112 background screening results required under this subsection to 1113 the department. 1114 (9)âPRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.âA private 1115 school participating in an educational scholarship program 1116 established pursuant to this chapter may be sectarian or 1117 nonsectarian and must be a private school as defined in s. 1118 1002.01 in this state, be registered, and be in compliance with 1119 all requirements of this section in addition to private school 1120 requirements outlined in s. 1002.42, specific requirements 1121 identified within respective scholarship program laws, and other 1122 provisions of Florida law that apply to private schools. 1123 Additionally, a private school participating in an educational 1124 scholarship program pursuant to this chapter, and must: 1125 (a)âComply with the antidiscrimination provisions of 42 1126 U.S.C. s. 2000d. 1127 (b)âNotify the department of its intent to participate in a 1128 scholarship program. 1129 (c)âNotify the department of any change in the schoolâs 1130 name, school director, mailing address, or physical location 1131 within 15 days after the change. 1132 (d)âProvide to the department or scholarship-funding 1133 organization all documentation required for a studentâs 1134 participation or required by the organization to process a 1135 scholarship payment, including the private schoolâs and 1136 studentâs individual fee schedule, and attendance verification 1137 as required by the department or scholarship-funding 1138 organization, prior to scholarship payment. Such information 1139 must be provided by the deadlines established by the 1140 organization and in accordance with the requirements of this 1141 section and ss. 1002.394 and 1002.395. A student is not eligible 1142 to receive a scholarship payment if the private school fails to 1143 meet the deadlines. 1144 (e)âAnnually complete and submit to the department a 1145 notarized scholarship compliance statement certifying that all 1146 school employees and contracted personnel with direct student 1147 contact have undergone background screening and have met the 1148 screening standards as provided in s. 1012.315. 1149 (f)âDemonstrate fiscal soundness and accountability by: 1150 1.âBeing in operation for at least 3 school years or 1151 obtaining a surety bond or letter of credit for the amount equal 1152 to the scholarship funds for any quarter and filing the surety 1153 bond or letter of credit with the department. 1154 2.âRequiring the parent of each scholarship student to 1155 personally restrictively endorse the scholarship warrant to the 1156 school or to approve a funds transfer before any funds are 1157 deposited for a student. The school may not act as attorney in 1158 fact for the parent of a scholarship student under the authority 1159 of a power of attorney executed by such parent, or under any 1160 other authority, to endorse a scholarship warrant or approve a 1161 funds transfer on behalf of such parent. 1162 (g)âMeet applicable state and local health, safety, and 1163 welfare laws, codes, and rules, including: 1164 1.âFiresafety. 1165 2.âBuilding safety. 1166 (h)âEmploy or contract with teachers who hold baccalaureate 1167 or higher degrees, have at least 3 years of teaching experience 1168 in public or private schools, or have special skills, knowledge, 1169 or expertise that qualifies them to provide instruction in 1170 subjects taught. 1171 (i)âMaintain a physical location in the state at which each 1172 student has regular and direct contact with teachers. Regular 1173 and direct contact with teachers may be satisfied for students 1174 enrolled pursuant to s. 1002.394(4)(b) or in a personalized 1175 education program if students have regular and direct contact 1176 with teachers at the physical location at least 2 school days 1177 per week and the student learning plan addresses the remaining 1178 instructional time. 1179 (j)âPublish on the schoolâs website, or provide in a 1180 written format, information for parents regarding the school, 1181 including, but not limited to, programs, services, the 1182 qualifications of classroom teachers, and a statement that a 1183 parentally placed private school student with a disability does 1184 not have an individual right to receive some or all of the 1185 special education and related services that the student would 1186 receive if enrolled in a public school under the Individuals 1187 with Disabilities Education Act (IDEA), as amended. 1188 (k)âAt a minimum, provide the parent of each scholarship 1189 student with a written explanation of the studentâs progress on 1190 a quarterly basis. 1191 (l)âCooperate with a student whose parent chooses to 1192 participate in the statewide assessments pursuant to s. 1008.22. 1193 (m)âRequire each employee and contracted personnel with 1194 direct student contact, upon employment or engagement to provide 1195 services, to undergo background screening under s. 1012.315 and 1196 deny employment to or terminate an employee if he or she fails 1197 to meet the screening standards under s. 1012.315. For purposes 1198 of this paragraph: 1199 1.âAn âemployee or contracted personnel with direct student 1200 contactâ means any employee or contracted personnel who has 1201 unsupervised access to a scholarship student for whom the 1202 private school is responsible. 1203 2.âThe costs of fingerprinting and the background check 1204 shall not be borne by the state. 1205 3.âContinued employment of an employee or contracted 1206 personnel after notification that he or she has failed the 1207 background screening under this paragraph shall cause a private 1208 school to be ineligible for participation in a scholarship 1209 program. 1210 4.âAn employee or contracted personnel holding a valid 1211 Florida teaching certificate who has been fingerprinted pursuant 1212 to s. 1012.32 is not required to comply with the provisions of 1213 this paragraph. 1214 5.âAll fingerprints submitted to the Department of Law 1215 Enforcement as required by this section must be retained in the 1216 Care Provider Background Screening Clearinghouse as provided in 1217 s. 435.12. 1218 6.âEmployees, contracted personnel, owners, and operators 1219 must be rescreened as required by s. 435.12. 1220 7.âPersons who apply for employment are governed by the 1221 laws and rules in effect at the time of application for 1222 employment, provided that the person is continually employed by 1223 the same school. 1224 (n)âAdopt policies establishing standards of ethical 1225 conduct for educational support employees, instructional 1226 personnel, and school administrators. The policies must require 1227 all educational support employees, instructional personnel, and 1228 school administrators, as defined in s. 1012.01, to complete 1229 training on the standards; establish the duty of educational 1230 support employees, instructional personnel, and school 1231 administrators to report, and procedures for reporting, alleged 1232 misconduct by other educational support employees, instructional 1233 personnel, and school administrators which affects the health, 1234 safety, or welfare of a student; and include an explanation of 1235 the liability protections provided under ss. 39.203 and 768.095. 1236 A private school, or any of its employees, may not enter into a 1237 confidentiality agreement regarding terminated or dismissed 1238 educational support employees, instructional personnel, or 1239 school administrators, or employees, personnel, or 1240 administrators who resign in lieu of termination, based in whole 1241 or in part on misconduct that affects the health, safety, or 1242 welfare of a student, and may not provide the employees, 1243 personnel, or administrators with employment references or 1244 discuss the employeesâ, personnelâs, or administratorsâ 1245 performance with prospective employers in another educational 1246 setting, without disclosing the employeesâ, personnelâs, or 1247 administratorsâ misconduct. Any part of an agreement or contract 1248 that has the purpose or effect of concealing misconduct by 1249 educational support employees, instructional personnel, or 1250 school administrators which affects the health, safety, or 1251 welfare of a student is void, is contrary to public policy, and 1252 may not be enforced. 1253 (o)âBefore employing a person in any position that requires 1254 direct contact with students, conduct employment history checks 1255 of previous employers, screen the person through use of the 1256 screening tools described in s. 1001.10(5), and document the 1257 findings. If unable to contact a previous employer, the private 1258 school must document efforts to contact the employer. The 1259 private school may not employ a person whose educator 1260 certificate is revoked, who is barred from reapplying for an 1261 educator certificate, or who is on the disqualification list 1262 maintained by the department pursuant to s. 1001.10(4)(b). 1263 (p)âRequire each owner or operator of the private school, 1264 prior to employment or engagement to provide services, to 1265 undergo background screening as provided in s. 1012.315. For 1266 purposes of this paragraph, the term âowner or operatorâ means 1267 an owner, an operator, a superintendent, or a principal of, or a 1268 person with equivalent decisionmaking authority over, a private 1269 school participating in a scholarship program established 1270 pursuant to this chapter. The fingerprints for the background 1271 screening must be electronically submitted to the Department of 1272 Law Enforcement and may be taken by an authorized law 1273 enforcement agency or a private company who is trained to take 1274 fingerprints. However, the complete set of fingerprints of an 1275 owner or operator may not be taken by the owner or operator. The 1276 cost of the background screening may be borne by the owner or 1277 operator. 1278 1.âIn addition to the offenses listed in s. 435.04, a 1279 person required to undergo background screening pursuant to this 1280 part or authorizing statutes may not have an arrest awaiting 1281 final disposition for, must not have been found guilty of, or 1282 entered a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of 1283 adjudication, and must not have been adjudicated delinquent for, 1284 and the record must not have been sealed or expunged for, any of 1285 the following offenses or any similar offense of another 1286 jurisdiction: 1287 a.âAny authorizing statutes, if the offense was a felony. 1288 b.âThis chapter, if the offense was a felony. 1289 c.âSection 409.920, relating to Medicaid provider fraud. 1290 d.âSection 409.9201, relating to Medicaid fraud. 1291 e.âSection 741.28, relating to domestic violence. 1292 f.âSection 817.034, relating to fraudulent acts through 1293 mail, wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or 1294 photooptical systems. 1295 g.âSection 817.234, relating to false and fraudulent 1296 insurance claims. 1297 h.âSection 817.505, relating to patient brokering. 1298 i.âSection 817.568, relating to criminal use of personal 1299 identification information. 1300 j.âSection 817.60, relating to obtaining a credit card 1301 through fraudulent means. 1302 k.âSection 817.61, relating to fraudulent use of credit 1303 cards, if the offense was a felony. 1304 l.âSection 831.01, relating to forgery. 1305 m.âSection 831.02, relating to uttering forged instruments. 1306 n.âSection 831.07, relating to forging bank bills, checks, 1307 drafts, or promissory notes. 1308 o.âSection 831.09, relating to uttering forged bank bills, 1309 checks, drafts, or promissory notes. 1310 p.âSection 831.30, relating to fraud in obtaining medicinal 1311 drugs. 1312 q.âSection 831.31, relating to the sale, manufacture, 1313 delivery, or possession with the intent to sell, manufacture, or 1314 deliver any counterfeit controlled substance, if the offense was 1315 a felony. 1316 2.âAt least 30 calendar days before a transfer of ownership 1317 of a private school, the owner or operator shall notify the 1318 parent of each scholarship student. 1319 3.âThe owner or operator of a private school that has been 1320 deemed ineligible to participate in a scholarship program 1321 pursuant to this chapter may not transfer ownership or 1322 management authority of the school to a relative in order to 1323 participate in a scholarship program as the same school or a new 1324 school. For purposes of this subparagraph, the term ârelativeâ 1325 means father, mother, son, daughter, grandfather, grandmother, 1326 brother, sister, uncle, aunt, cousin, nephew, niece, husband, 1327 wife, father-in-law, mother-in-law, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, 1328 brother-in-law, sister-in-law, stepfather, stepmother, stepson, 1329 stepdaughter, stepbrother, stepsister, half brother, or half 1330 sister. 1331 (p)(q)âProvide a report from an independent certified 1332 public accountant who performs the agreed-upon procedures 1333 developed pursuant to s. 1002.395(6)(l) s. 1002.395(6)(q) if the 1334 private school receives more than $250,000 in funds from 1335 scholarships awarded under this chapter in a state fiscal year. 1336 A private school subject to this subsection must annually submit 1337 the report by September 15 to the scholarship-funding 1338 organization that awarded the majority of the schoolâs 1339 scholarship funds. The agreed-upon procedures must be conducted 1340 in accordance with attestation standards established by the 1341 American Institute of Certified Public Accountants. 1342 (q)(r)âProhibit education support employees, instructional 1343 personnel, and school administrators from employment in any 1344 position that requires direct contact with students if the 1345 personnel or administrators are ineligible for such employment 1346 pursuant to this section or s. 1012.315, or have been terminated 1347 or have resigned in lieu of termination for sexual misconduct 1348 with a student. If the prohibited conduct occurs subsequent to 1349 employment, the private school must report the person and the 1350 disqualifying circumstances to the department for inclusion on 1351 the disqualification list maintained pursuant to s. 1352 1001.10(4)(b). 1353 (r)(s)âNot be owned or operated by a person or an entity 1354 domiciled in, owned by, or in any way controlled by a foreign 1355 country of concern or foreign principal as defined in s. 1356 288.860. A violation of this paragraph constitutes an imminent 1357 threat to the health, safety, and welfare of the schoolâs 1358 students and to the public, sufficient to justify immediate 1359 suspension of payment of scholarship funds under paragraph 1360 (11)(e) paragraph (3)(e), as well as denial, suspension, or 1361 revocation of a schoolâs participation in a scholarship program 1362 under paragraph (11)(b) paragraph (3)(b). 1363 (s)âThe inclusion of eligible private schools within 1364 options available to Florida public school students does not 1365 expand the regulatory authority of the state, its officers, or 1366 any school district to impose any additional regulation of 1367 private schools beyond that reasonably necessary to enforce 1368 requirements expressly set forth in this section. 1369 1370 The department shall suspend the payment of funds to a private 1371 school that knowingly fails to comply with this subsection or 1372 subsection (8), and shall prohibit the school from enrolling new 1373 scholarship students, for 1 fiscal year and until the school 1374 complies. If a private school fails to meet the requirements of 1375 this subsection or subsection (8) or has consecutive years of 1376 material exceptions listed in the report required under 1377 paragraph (p) (q), the commissioner may determine that the 1378 private school is ineligible to participate in a scholarship 1379 program. 1380 (10)(2)âDEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OBLIGATIONS.â 1381 (a)âThe Department of Education shall: 1382 1.âAnnually verify the eligibility of private schools that 1383 meet the requirements of this section, specific requirements 1384 identified within respective scholarship program laws, and other 1385 provisions of state law that apply to private schools. 1386 2.âEstablish a toll-free hotline that provides parents and 1387 private schools with information on participation in the 1388 scholarship programs. 1389 3.âPublish and update, as necessary, information on the 1390 department website about the educational scholarship programs 1391 established under this chapter, including, but not limited to, 1392 student eligibility criteria, parental responsibilities, and 1393 relevant data. The information must include a list of approved 1394 providers as required by s. 1002.66, eligible postsecondary 1395 educational institutions, eligible private schools, and eligible 1396 organizations and may identify or provide links to lists of 1397 other approved providers. 1398 4.âEstablish a process by which individuals may notify the 1399 department of any violation by a parent, private school, or 1400 school district of state laws relating to program participation. 1401 If the department has reasonable cause to believe that a 1402 violation of this section or any rule adopted by the State Board 1403 of Education has occurred, it shall conduct an inquiry or make a 1404 referral to the appropriate agency for an investigation. A 1405 department inquiry is not subject to the requirements of chapter 1406 120. 1407 5.âInvestigate any written complaint of a violation of this 1408 section by a parent, a student, a participating private school, 1409 a public school, a school district, an organization, a provider, 1410 or another appropriate party in accordance with the process 1411 established under s. 1002.421. 1412 6.âInvestigate fraudulent activity on behalf of 1413 organizations, participating eligible private schools, or 1414 scholarship recipients to determine possible fraud or 1415 overpayment. If, by the departmentâs own inquiries or as a 1416 result of a complaint, the commissioner has reason to believe 1417 that an organization, a private school, or a recipient has 1418 engaged in, or is engaging in, a fraudulent act, he or she shall 1419 investigate and determine whether any fraud or overpayment has 1420 occurred. During the investigation, the department may examine 1421 all records and make inquiry of all persons who may have 1422 knowledge as to any irregularity incidental to the disbursement 1423 of state funds or other items or benefit authorizations to 1424 scholarship recipients. Based on the results of the 1425 investigation, the department may, in its discretion, refer the 1426 investigation to the Department of Financial Services for 1427 criminal investigation. Any suspected criminal violation 1428 identified by the department must be referred to the Department 1429 of Financial Services for criminal investigation. A person who 1430 commits an act of fraud is subject to the penalties provided in 1431 s. 414.39(5). 1432 7.4.âRequire an annual, notarized, sworn compliance 1433 statement from participating private schools certifying 1434 compliance with state laws, and retain such records. 1435 8.5.âCoordinate with the entities conducting the health 1436 inspection for a private school to obtain copies of the 1437 inspection reports. 1438 9.6.âConduct site visits to private schools entering a 1439 scholarship program for the first time. Beginning with the 2019 1440 2020 school year, a private school is not eligible to receive 1441 scholarship payments until a satisfactory site visit has been 1442 conducted and the school is in compliance with all other 1443 requirements of this section. 1444 10.7.âCoordinate with the State Fire Marshal to obtain 1445 access to fire inspection reports for private schools. The 1446 authority conducting the fire safety inspection shall certify to 1447 the State Fire Marshal that the annual inspection has been 1448 completed and that the school is in full compliance. The 1449 certification shall be made electronically or by such other 1450 means as directed by the State Fire Marshal. 1451 11.8.âUpon the request of a participating private school 1452 authorized to administer statewide assessments, provide at no 1453 cost to the school the statewide assessments administered under 1454 s. 1008.22 and any related materials for administering the 1455 assessments. Students at a private school may be assessed using 1456 the statewide assessments if the addition of those students and 1457 the school does not cause the state to exceed its contractual 1458 caps for the number of students tested and the number of testing 1459 sites. The state shall provide the same materials and support to 1460 a private school that it provides to a public school. A private 1461 school that chooses to administer statewide assessments under s. 1462 1008.22 shall follow the requirements set forth in ss. 1008.22 1463 and 1008.24, rules adopted by the State Board of Education to 1464 implement those sections, and district-level testing policies 1465 established by the district school board. 1466 12.âMaintain and annually publish a list of nationally 1467 norm-referenced tests identified for purposes of satisfying the 1468 testing requirements in subsection (7). The tests must meet 1469 industry standards of quality in accordance with state board 1470 rule. 1471 13.âDevelop a standard withdrawal form for parents who are 1472 withdrawing their students from public school to enroll in a 1473 scholarship program under this chapter. The form must include 1474 the studentâs Florida student identification number, full name, 1475 date of birth, school or program from which the student is 1476 withdrawing, and date of withdrawal. 1477 14.âAnnually report on the number of students withdrawing 1478 from each scholarship program and enrolling in a public school, 1479 and the number of students withdrawing from a public school and 1480 enrolling in a scholarship program, by scholarship type. 1481 (b)âThe department may conduct site visits to any private 1482 school participating in a scholarship program pursuant to this 1483 chapter that has received a complaint about a violation of state 1484 law or state board rule pursuant to subparagraph (a)3. or has 1485 received a notice of noncompliance or a notice of proposed 1486 action within the previous 2 years. 1487 (c)âAt the direction of the Commissioner of Education, the 1488 department may: 1489 1.âSuspend or revoke program participation or use of 1490 program funds by the student or participation or eligibility of 1491 an organization, eligible postsecondary educational institution, 1492 approved provider, or other party for a violation of this 1493 section. 1494 2.âDetermine the length of, and conditions for lifting, a 1495 suspension or revocation specified in this paragraph. 1496 3.âRecover unexpended program funds or withhold payment of 1497 an equal amount of program funds to recover program funds that 1498 were not authorized for use. 1499 1500 In determining whether to suspend or revoke participation or 1501 lift a suspension or revocation in accordance with this 1502 paragraph, the department may consider factors that include, but 1503 are not limited to, acts or omissions that led to a previous 1504 suspension or revocation of participation in a state or federal 1505 program or an education scholarship program; failure to 1506 reimburse the organization for funds improperly received or 1507 retained; failure to reimburse government funds improperly 1508 received or retained; imposition of a prior criminal sanction 1509 related to the person or entity or its officers or employees; 1510 imposition of a civil fine or administrative fine, license 1511 revocation or suspension, or program eligibility suspension, 1512 termination, or revocation related to a personâs or entityâs 1513 management or operation; or other types of criminal proceedings 1514 in which the person or entity or its officers or employees were 1515 found guilty of, regardless of adjudication, or entered a plea 1516 of nolo contendere or guilty to, any offense involving fraud, 1517 deceit, dishonesty, or moral turpitude. 1518 (d)âThe department, in consultation with the organization, 1519 shall develop a uniform reimbursement process that organizations 1520 must use, beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, when 1521 processing reimbursement requests, including invoices, pursuant 1522 to s. 1002.394(11)(b) or s. 1002.395(6)(p). An organization must 1523 approve, deny, or request more information relating to a 1524 reimbursement request within 30 days after receipt of such 1525 request. The department shall coordinate with each organization 1526 to develop a process to collect input and feedback from parents, 1527 private schools, and providers before an organization may 1528 implement substantial modifications or enhancements to the 1529 reimbursement process. 1530 (e)âAnnually, by December 15, the department shall report 1531 to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of 1532 the House of Representatives its actions in implementing 1533 accountability in the scholarship programs under this section, 1534 both Florida Empowerment Scholarships and Florida Tax Credit 1535 Scholarships, any substantiated allegations or violations of law 1536 or rule by an eligible private school or organization under this 1537 section, and the corrective action taken. 1538 (11)(3)âCOMMISSIONER OF EDUCATION AUTHORITY AND 1539 OBLIGATIONS.âThe Commissioner of Education: 1540 (a)âShall deny, suspend, or revoke a private schoolâs 1541 participation in a scholarship program if it is determined that 1542 the private school has failed to comply with this section or 1543 exhibits a previous pattern of failure to comply. However, if 1544 the noncompliance is correctable within a reasonable amount of 1545 time, not to exceed 45 days, and if the health, safety, or 1546 welfare of the students is not threatened, the commissioner may 1547 issue a notice of noncompliance which provides the private 1548 school with a timeframe within which to provide evidence of 1549 compliance before taking action to suspend or revoke the private 1550 schoolâs participation in the scholarship program. 1551 (b)âMay deny, suspend, or revoke a private schoolâs 1552 participation in a scholarship program if the commissioner 1553 determines that an owner or operator of the private school is 1554 operating or has operated an educational institution in this 1555 state or in another state or jurisdiction in a manner contrary 1556 to the health, safety, or welfare of the public or if the owner 1557 or operator has exhibited a previous pattern of failure to 1558 comply with this section or specific requirements identified 1559 within respective scholarship program laws. For purposes of this 1560 subsection, the term âowner or operatorâ has the same meaning as 1561 provided in paragraph (1)(p). 1562 (c)âMay permanently deny or revoke the authority of an 1563 owner, officer, or director to establish or operate a private 1564 school in the state and include such individual on the 1565 disqualification list maintained by the department pursuant to 1566 s. 1001.10(4)(b) if the commissioner decides that the owner, 1567 officer, or director: 1568 1.âIs operating or has operated an educational institution 1569 in the state or another state or jurisdiction in a manner 1570 contrary to the health, safety, or welfare of the public; or 1571 2.âHas operated an educational institution that closed 1572 during the school year. An individual may be removed from the 1573 disqualification list if the individual reimburses the 1574 department or eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 1575 organization the amount of scholarship funds received by the 1576 educational institution during the school year in which it 1577 closed. 1578 (d)1.âIn making such a determination, may consider factors 1579 that include, but are not limited to, acts or omissions by an 1580 owner or operator which led to a previous denial, suspension, or 1581 revocation of participation in a state or federal education 1582 scholarship program; an ownerâs or operatorâs failure to 1583 reimburse the department or scholarship-funding organization for 1584 scholarship funds improperly received or retained by a school; 1585 the imposition of a prior criminal sanction related to an 1586 ownerâs or operatorâs management or operation of an educational 1587 institution; the imposition of a civil fine or administrative 1588 fine, license revocation or suspension, or program eligibility 1589 suspension, termination, or revocation related to an ownerâs or 1590 operatorâs management or operation of an educational 1591 institution; or other types of criminal proceedings in which an 1592 owner or operator was found guilty of, regardless of 1593 adjudication, or entered a plea of nolo contendere or guilty to, 1594 any offense involving fraud, deceit, dishonesty, or moral 1595 turpitude. 1596 2.âThe commissionerâs determination is subject to the 1597 following: 1598 a.âIf the commissioner intends to deny, suspend, or revoke 1599 a private schoolâs participation in the scholarship program, the 1600 department shall notify the private school of such proposed 1601 action in writing by certified mail and regular mail to the 1602 private schoolâs address of record with the department. The 1603 notification shall include the reasons for the proposed action 1604 and notice of the timelines and procedures set forth in this 1605 paragraph. 1606 b.âThe private school that is adversely affected by the 1607 proposed action shall have 15 days after receipt of the notice 1608 of proposed action to file with the departmentâs agency clerk a 1609 request for a proceeding pursuant to ss. 120.569 and 120.57. If 1610 the private school is entitled to a hearing under s. 120.57(1), 1611 the department shall forward the request to the Division of 1612 Administrative Hearings. 1613 c.âUpon receipt of a request referred pursuant to this 1614 subparagraph, the director of the Division of Administrative 1615 Hearings shall expedite the hearing and assign an administrative 1616 law judge who shall commence a hearing within 30 days after the 1617 receipt of the formal written request by the division and enter 1618 a recommended order within 30 days after the hearing or within 1619 30 days after receipt of the hearing transcript, whichever is 1620 later. Each party shall be allowed 10 days in which to submit 1621 written exceptions to the recommended order. A final order shall 1622 be entered by the agency within 30 days after the entry of a 1623 recommended order. The provisions of this sub-subparagraph may 1624 be waived upon stipulation by all parties. 1625 (e)âMay immediately suspend payment of scholarship funds if 1626 it is determined that there is probable cause to believe that 1627 there is: 1628 1.âAn imminent threat to the health, safety, or welfare of 1629 the students; 1630 2.âA previous pattern of failure to comply with this 1631 section; or 1632 3.âFraudulent activity on the part of the private school; 1633 4.âFraudulent activity or failure to comply with this 1634 section on the part of an organization; or 1635 5.âFraudulent activity or failure to comply with this 1636 section on the part of a scholarship recipient. 1637 1638 Notwithstanding s. 1002.22, in incidents of alleged fraudulent 1639 activity pursuant to this section, the departmentâs Office of 1640 Inspector General is authorized to release personally 1641 identifiable records or reports of students to the following 1642 persons or organizations: 1643 a.âA court of competent jurisdiction in compliance with an 1644 order of that court or the attorney of record in accordance with 1645 a lawfully issued subpoena, consistent with the Family 1646 Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. s. 1232g. 1647 b.âA person or entity authorized by a court of competent 1648 jurisdiction in compliance with an order of that court or the 1649 attorney of record pursuant to a lawfully issued subpoena, 1650 consistent with the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act, 1651 20 U.S.C. s. 1232g. 1652 c.âAny person, entity, or authority issuing a subpoena for 1653 law enforcement purposes when the court or other issuing agency 1654 has ordered that the existence or the contents of the subpoena 1655 or the information furnished in response to the subpoena not be 1656 disclosed, consistent with the Family Educational Rights and 1657 Privacy Act, 20 U.S.C. s. 1232g, and 34 C.F.R. s. 99.31. 1658 1659 The commissionerâs order suspending payment pursuant to this 1660 paragraph may be appealed pursuant to the same procedures and 1661 timelines as the notice of proposed action set forth in 1662 subparagraph (d)2. 1663 (12)âSCHOOL DISTRICT OBLIGATIONS.â 1664 (a)âBy January 1 of each year, a school district shall 1665 inform all households within the district receiving free or 1666 reduced-priced meals under the National School Lunch Act of 1667 their eligibility to apply for a scholarship program established 1668 under this chapter. The form of such notice shall be provided by 1669 the department, and the school district shall include the 1670 provided form in any normal correspondence with eligible 1671 households. If an organization requests a special communication 1672 to be issued to households within the district receiving free or 1673 reduced-price meals under the National School Lunch Act, the 1674 organization shall reimburse the district for the cost of 1675 postage. Such notice is limited to once a year. 1676 (b)âUpon the request of the department, a school district 1677 shall coordinate with the department to provide to a 1678 participating private school the statewide assessments 1679 administered under s. 1008.22 and any related materials for 1680 administering the assessments. For a student participating in a 1681 scholarship program established under this chapter whose parent 1682 requests that the student take the statewide assessments under 1683 s. 1008.22, the district in which the student attends a 1684 participating private school shall provide locations and times 1685 to take all statewide assessments. A school district is 1686 responsible for implementing test administrations at a 1687 participating private school, including: 1688 1.âProviding training for private school staff on test 1689 security and assessment administration procedures; 1690 2.âDistributing testing materials to a private school; 1691 3.âRetrieving testing materials from a private school; 1692 4.âProviding the required format for a private school to 1693 submit information to the district for test administration and 1694 enrollment purposes; and 1695 5.âProviding any required assistance, monitoring, or 1696 investigation at a private school. 1697 (c)âEach school district must publish information about a 1698 scholarship program established under this chapter on the 1699 districtâs website homepage. At a minimum, the published 1700 information must include a website link to the scholarship 1701 programs published on the departmentâs website as well as a 1702 telephone number and e-mail address that students and parents 1703 may use to contact relevant personnel in the school district to 1704 obtain information about the scholarship. 1705 (d)âA school district, upon the request of a parent, must 1706 provide the parent of a student enrolled in a school in the 1707 school district the standard withdrawal form developed by the 1708 department. The school district must sign a completed form 1709 within 10 days after receipt. The school district must also 1710 publish the withdrawal form on its website in a downloadable 1711 format no later than 10 days after adoption by the department. 1712 (4)âThe inclusion of eligible private schools within 1713 options available to Florida public school students does not 1714 expand the regulatory authority of the state, its officers, or 1715 any school district to impose any additional regulation of 1716 private schools beyond those reasonably necessary to enforce 1717 requirements expressly set forth in this section. 1718 (13)(5)âRULEMAKING.âThe State Board of Education shall 1719 adopt rules pursuant to ss. 120.536(1) and 120.54 to administer 1720 this section, including rules to establish a deadline for 1721 private school applications for participation and timelines for 1722 the department to conduct site visits. 1723 Section 5.âSubsections (2) through (12) of section 1724 1002.394, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1725 1002.394âThe Family Empowerment Scholarship Program.â 1726 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 1727 (a)ââApproved providerâ means a provider approved by the 1728 Agency for Persons with Disabilities, a health care practitioner 1729 as defined in s. 456.001, or a provider approved by the 1730 department pursuant to s. 1002.66. 1731 (b)ââChoice navigatorâ has the same meaning as in s. 1732 1002.395(2). 1733 (c)ââCurriculumâ means a complete course of study for a 1734 particular content area or grade level, including any required 1735 supplemental materials and associated online instruction. 1736 (d)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Education. 1737 (e)ââDisabilityâ means, for a 3- or 4-year-old child or for 1738 a student in kindergarten to grade 12, autism spectrum disorder, 1739 as defined in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental 1740 Disorders, Fifth Edition, published by the American Psychiatric 1741 Association; cerebral palsy, as defined in s. 393.063; Down 1742 syndrome, as defined in s. 393.063; an intellectual disability, 1743 as defined in s. 393.063; a speech impairment; a language 1744 impairment; an orthopedic impairment; any other health 1745 impairment; an emotional or a behavioral disability; a specific 1746 learning disability, including, but not limited to, dyslexia, 1747 dyscalculia, or developmental aphasia; Phelan-McDermid syndrome, 1748 as defined in s. 393.063; Prader-Willi syndrome, as defined in 1749 s. 393.063; spina bifida, as defined in s. 393.063; being a 1750 high-risk child, as defined in s. 393.063(23)(a); muscular 1751 dystrophy; Williams syndrome; rare diseases which affect patient 1752 populations of fewer than 200,000 individuals in the United 1753 States, as defined by the National Organization for Rare 1754 Disorders; anaphylaxis; a hearing impairment, including 1755 deafness; a visual impairment, including blindness; traumatic 1756 brain injury; hospital or homebound; or identification as dual 1757 sensory impaired, as defined by rules of the State Board of 1758 Education and evidenced by reports from local school districts. 1759 The term âhospital or homeboundâ includes a student who has a 1760 medically diagnosed physical or psychiatric condition or 1761 illness, as defined by the state board in rule, and who is 1762 confined to the home or hospital for more than 6 months. 1763 (f)ââEligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organizationâ 1764 or âorganizationâ has the same meaning as in s. 1002.395(2). 1765 (g)ââEligible postsecondary educational institutionâ means 1766 a Florida College System institution; a state university; a 1767 school district technical center; a school district adult 1768 general education center; an independent college or university 1769 that is eligible to participate in the William L. Boyd, IV, 1770 Effective Access to Student Education Grant Program under s. 1771 1009.89; or an accredited independent postsecondary educational 1772 institution, as defined in s. 1005.02, which is licensed to 1773 operate in this state under part III of chapter 1005 or is 1774 approved to participate in a reciprocity agreement as defined in 1775 s. 1000.35(2). 1776 (h)ââEligible private schoolâ has the same meaning as in s. 1777 1002.395(2). 1778 (i)ââIEPâ means an individual education plan, regardless of 1779 whether the plan has been reviewed or revised within the last 12 1780 months. 1781 (j)ââInactiveâ means that no eligible expenditures have 1782 been made from an account funded pursuant to paragraph (12)(b). 1783 (k)ââJob coachâ means an individual employed to help people 1784 with disabilities learn, accommodate to, and perform their work 1785 duties. 1786 (l)ââLaw enforcement officerâ has the same meaning as 1787 provided in s. 943.10(1). 1788 (m)ââParentâ means a resident of this state who is a 1789 parent, as defined in s. 1000.21. 1790 (b)(n)ââProgramâ means the Family Empowerment Scholarship 1791 Program. 1792 (3)âSCHOLARSHIP ELIGIBILITY.â 1793 (a)1.âA parent of a student may apply pursuant to s. 1794 1002.421 for and receive from the state a scholarship for the 1795 purposes specified in paragraph (4)(a) if the student: 1796 1.a.âIs a resident of this state or the dependent child of 1797 an active duty member of the United States Armed Forces who has 1798 received permanent change of station orders to this state; and 1799 2.b.âIs eligible to enroll in kindergarten through grade 12 1800 in a public school in this state or received a scholarship under 1801 the former Hope Scholarship Program in the 2023-2024 school 1802 year. 1803 2.âPriority must be given in the following order: 1804 a.âA student whose household income level does not exceed 1805 185 percent of the federal poverty level or who is in foster 1806 care or out-of-home care. 1807 b.âA student whose household income level exceeds 185 1808 percent of the federal poverty level, but does not exceed 400 1809 percent of the federal poverty level. 1810 (b)âA parent of a student with a disability may apply 1811 pursuant to s. 1002.421 for and receive from the state a 1812 scholarship, which shall be referred to as the McKay-Gardiner 1813 Scholarship, for the purposes specified in paragraph (4)(b) if 1814 the student: 1815 1.âIs a resident of this state or the dependent child of an 1816 active duty member of the United States Armed Forces who has 1817 received permanent change of station orders to this state or, at 1818 the time of renewal, whose home of record or state of legal 1819 residence is Florida; 1820 2.âIs 3 or 4 years of age during the year in which the 1821 student applies for program participation or is eligible to 1822 enroll in kindergarten through grade 12 in a public school in 1823 this state; 1824 3.âHas a disability as defined in subsection (2); and 1825 4.âIs the subject of an IEP written in accordance with 1826 rules of the State Board of Education or with the applicable 1827 rules of another state or has received a diagnosis of a 1828 disability from a physician who is licensed under chapter 458 or 1829 chapter 459, a psychologist who is licensed under chapter 490, 1830 or a physician who holds an active license issued by another 1831 state or territory of the United States, the District of 1832 Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico. 1833 (4)âAUTHORIZED USES OF PROGRAM FUNDS.â 1834 (a)âProgram funds awarded to a student determined eligible 1835 pursuant to paragraph (3)(a) may be used for: 1836 1.âTuition and fees at an eligible private school. 1837 2.âInstructional materials, including digital materials, 1838 digital devices, and Internet resources. 1839 3.âCurriculum as defined in subsection (2). 1840 4.âTuition and fees associated with full-time or part-time 1841 enrollment in an eligible postsecondary educational institution 1842 or a program offered by the postsecondary educational 1843 institution, unless the program is subject to s. 1009.25 or 1844 reimbursed pursuant to s. 1009.30; an approved preapprenticeship 1845 program as defined in s. 446.021(5) which is not subject to s. 1846 1009.25 and complies with all applicable requirements of the 1847 department pursuant to chapter 1005; a private tutoring program 1848 authorized under s. 1002.43; a virtual program offered by a 1849 department-approved private online provider that meets the 1850 provider qualifications specified in s. 1002.45(2)(a); the 1851 Florida Virtual School as a private paying student; or an 1852 approved online course offered pursuant to s. 1003.499 or s. 1853 1004.0961. 1854 5.âFees for nationally standardized, norm-referenced 1855 achievement tests, Advanced Placement Examinations, industry 1856 certification examinations, assessments related to postsecondary 1857 education, or other assessments. 1858 6.âContracted services provided by a public school or 1859 school district, including classes. A student who receives 1860 contracted services under this subparagraph is not considered 1861 enrolled in a public school for eligibility purposes as 1862 specified in subsection (6) but rather attending a public school 1863 on a part-time basis as authorized under s. 1002.44. 1864 7.âTuition and fees for part-time tutoring services or fees 1865 for services provided by a choice navigator. Such services must 1866 be provided by a person who holds a valid Florida educatorâs 1867 certificate pursuant to s. 1012.56, a person who holds an 1868 adjunct teaching certificate pursuant to s. 1012.57, a person 1869 who has a bachelorâs degree or a graduate degree in the subject 1870 area or related subject area in which instruction is given, a 1871 person who has demonstrated a mastery of subject area knowledge 1872 pursuant to s. 1012.56(5), or a person certified by a nationally 1873 or internationally recognized research-based training program as 1874 approved by the department. As used in this subparagraph, the 1875 term âpart-time tutoring servicesâ does not qualify as regular 1876 school attendance as defined in s. 1003.01(16)(e). 1877 8.âMembership dues and related activity fees for 1878 participation in career and technical student organizations. 1879 (b)âProgram funds awarded to a student with a disability 1880 determined eligible pursuant to paragraph (3)(b) may be used for 1881 the following purposes: 1882 1.âInstructional materials, including digital devices, 1883 digital periphery devices, and assistive technology devices that 1884 allow a student to access instruction or instructional content 1885 and training on the use of and maintenance agreements for these 1886 devices. 1887 2.âCurriculum as defined in subsection (2). 1888 3.âSpecialized services by approved providers or by a 1889 hospital in this state which are selected by the parent. These 1890 specialized services may include, but are not limited to: 1891 a.âApplied behavior analysis services as provided in ss. 1892 627.6686 and 641.31098. 1893 b.âServices provided by speech-language pathologists as 1894 defined in s. 468.1125(8). 1895 c.âOccupational therapy as defined in s. 468.203. 1896 d.âServices provided by physical therapists as defined in 1897 s. 486.021(8). 1898 e.âServices provided by listening and spoken language 1899 specialists and an appropriate acoustical environment for a 1900 child who has a hearing impairment, including deafness, and who 1901 has received an implant or assistive hearing device. 1902 4.âTuition and fees associated with full-time or part-time 1903 enrollment in a home education program that meets all of the 1904 following requirements: 1905 a.âProvides educational courses or activities. 1906 b.âHas a publicly available description of courses and 1907 activities. 1908 c.âHas a tuition and fee schedule. 1909 d.âMakes the tuition and fees payable to a registered 1910 business entity. 1911 5.âTuition and fees associated with full-time or part-time 1912 enrollment in; an eligible private school; an eligible 1913 postsecondary educational institution or a program offered by 1914 the postsecondary educational institution, unless the program is 1915 subject to s. 1009.25 or reimbursed pursuant to s. 1009.30; an 1916 approved preapprenticeship program as defined in s. 446.021(5) 1917 which is not subject to s. 1009.25 and complies with all 1918 applicable requirements of the department pursuant to chapter 1919 1005; a private tutoring program authorized under s. 1002.43; a 1920 virtual program offered by a department-approved private online 1921 provider that meets the provider qualifications specified in s. 1922 1002.45(2)(a); the Florida Virtual School as a private paying 1923 student; or an approved online course offered pursuant to s. 1924 1003.499 or s. 1004.0961. 1925 6.5.âFees for nationally standardized, norm-referenced 1926 achievement tests, Advanced Placement Examinations, industry 1927 certification examinations, assessments related to postsecondary 1928 education, or other assessments. 1929 7.6.âContributions to the Stanley G. Tate Florida Prepaid 1930 College Program pursuant to s. 1009.98 or the Florida College 1931 Savings Program pursuant to s. 1009.981 for the benefit of the 1932 eligible student. 1933 8.7.âContracted services provided by a public school or 1934 school district, including classes. A student who receives 1935 services under a contract under this paragraph is not considered 1936 enrolled in a public school for eligibility purposes as 1937 specified in subsection (6) but rather attending a public school 1938 on a part-time basis as authorized under s. 1002.44. 1939 9.8.âTuition and fees for part-time tutoring services or 1940 fees for services provided by a choice navigator. Such services 1941 must be provided by a person who holds a valid Florida 1942 educatorâs certificate pursuant to s. 1012.56, a person who 1943 holds an adjunct teaching certificate pursuant to s. 1012.57, a 1944 person who has a bachelorâs degree or a graduate degree in the 1945 subject area or related subject area in which instruction is 1946 given, a person who has demonstrated a mastery of subject area 1947 knowledge pursuant to s. 1012.56(5), or a person certified by a 1948 nationally or internationally recognized research-based training 1949 program as approved by the department. As used in this 1950 subparagraph, the term âpart-time tutoring servicesâ does not 1951 qualify as regular school attendance as defined in s. 1952 1003.01(16)(e). 1953 10.9.âFees for specialized summer education programs. 1954 11.10.âFees for specialized after-school education 1955 programs. 1956 12.11.âTransition services provided by job coaches. 1957 Transition services are a coordinated set of activities which 1958 are focused on improving the academic and functional achievement 1959 of a student with a disability to facilitate the studentâs 1960 movement from school to postschool activities and are based on 1961 the studentâs needs. 1962 13.12.âFees for an annual evaluation of educational 1963 progress by a state-certified teacher under s. 1002.41(1)(f), if 1964 this option is chosen for a home education student. 1965 14.13.âTuition and fees associated with programs offered by 1966 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program providers approved 1967 pursuant to s. 1002.55, school readiness providers approved 1968 pursuant to s. 1002.88, and prekindergarten programs offered by 1969 an eligible private school. 1970 15.14.âFees for services provided at a center that is a 1971 member of the Professional Association of Therapeutic 1972 Horsemanship International. 1973 16.15.âFees for services provided by a therapist who is 1974 certified by the Certification Board for Music Therapists or 1975 credentialed by the Art Therapy Credentials Board, Inc. 1976 17.âMembership dues and related activity fees for 1977 participation in career and technical student organizations. 1978 (5)âTERM OF SCHOLARSHIP.âFor purposes of continuity of 1979 educational choice: 1980 (a)1.âA scholarship funded to an eligible student pursuant 1981 to paragraph (3)(a) shall remain in force until: 1982 a.âThe organization determines that the student is not 1983 eligible for program renewal; 1984 b.âThe Commissioner of Education suspends or revokes 1985 program participation or use of funds; 1986 c.âThe studentâs parent has forfeited participation in the 1987 program for failure to comply with the scholarship program 1988 requirements subsection (10); 1989 d.âThe student, who uses the scholarship for tuition and 1990 fees pursuant to subparagraph (4)(a)1., enrolls in a public 1991 school. However, if a student enters a Department of Juvenile 1992 Justice detention center for a period of no more than 21 days, 1993 the student is not considered to have returned to a public 1994 school on a full-time basis for that purpose; or 1995 e.âThe student graduates from high school or attains 21 1996 years of age, whichever occurs first. 1997 2.a.âThe studentâs scholarship account must be closed and 1998 any remaining funds shall revert to the state after: 1999 a.(I)âDenial or revocation of program eligibility by the 2000 commissioner for fraud or abuse, including, but not limited to, 2001 the student or studentâs parent accepting any payment, refund, 2002 or rebate, in any manner, from a provider of any services 2003 received pursuant to paragraph (4)(a); 2004 b.(II)âOne fiscal year Two consecutive fiscal years in 2005 which an account has been inactive; or 2006 c.(III)âA student remains unenrolled in an eligible private 2007 school for 30 days while receiving a scholarship that requires 2008 full-time enrollment; or 2009 d.âA studentâs scholarship no longer remains in force due 2010 to any of the reasons provided in subparagraph 1. 2011 3.âAn organization must notify the parent prior to closing 2012 a studentâs account regarding the reason the account will be 2013 closed and that the balance of funds will revert upon closure. 2014 4.âAn organization must annually report to the department 2015 the total number of scholarship accounts that were closed 2016 pursuant to subparagraph 2. and the amount of funds, by account, 2017 which 2018 b.âReimbursements for program expenditures may continue 2019 until the account balance is expended or remaining funds have 2020 reverted to the state. 2021 (b)1.âA scholarship funded to an eligible student pursuant 2022 to paragraph (3)(b) shall remain in force until: 2023 a.âThe parent does not renew program eligibility; 2024 b.âThe organization determines that the student is not 2025 eligible for program renewal; 2026 c.âThe Commissioner of Education suspends or revokes 2027 program participation or use of funds; 2028 d.âThe studentâs parent has forfeited participation in the 2029 program for failure to comply with the scholarship requirements 2030 subsection (10); 2031 e.âThe student enrolls full time in a public school; or 2032 f.âThe student graduates from high school or attains 22 2033 years of age, whichever occurs first. 2034 2.âReimbursements for program expenditures may continue 2035 until the account balance is expended or the account is closed. 2036 3.âA studentâs scholarship account must be closed and any 2037 remaining funds, including, but not limited to, contributions 2038 made to the Stanley G. Tate Florida Prepaid College Program or 2039 earnings from or contributions made to the Florida College 2040 Savings Program using program funds pursuant to subparagraph 2041 (4)(b)7. (4)(b)6., shall revert to the state after: 2042 a.âDenial or revocation of program eligibility by the 2043 commissioner for fraud or abuse, including, but not limited to, 2044 the student or studentâs parent accepting any payment, refund, 2045 or rebate, in any manner, from a provider of any services 2046 received pursuant to subsection (4); or 2047 b.âAny period of 3 consecutive years after high school 2048 completion or graduation during which the student has not been 2049 enrolled in an eligible postsecondary educational institution or 2050 a program offered by the institution; or 2051 c.âTwo consecutive fiscal years in which an account has 2052 been inactive. 2053 4.âAn organization must notify the parent prior to closing 2054 a studentâs account regarding the reason the account will be 2055 closed and that the balance of funds will revert upon closure. 2056 5.âUpon a student reaching the age of 16, the organization 2057 must notify the parent if there is a balance in the studentâs 2058 account and provide the amount of the balance and information 2059 regarding how the funds may be used. 2060 6.âAn organization must annually report to the department 2061 the total number of scholarship accounts that were closed 2062 pursuant to subparagraph 3. and the amount of funds by account 2063 that reverted to the state. 2064 (c)âUpon reasonable notice to the organization and the 2065 school district, the studentâs parent may remove the student 2066 from the participating private school and place the student in a 2067 public school in accordance with this section. Upon receipt of 2068 notification from the parent, the organization must notify the 2069 department of the studentâs withdrawal from the scholarship 2070 program and may not provide payments into the studentâs account. 2071 A violation of this paragraph by the organization results in 2072 liability on behalf of the organization pursuant to s. 2073 1002.421(4)(d). 2074 (d)âUpon reasonable notice to the organization, the 2075 studentâs parent may move the student from one participating 2076 private school to another participating private school. 2077 (6)âSCHOLARSHIP PROHIBITIONS.âA student is not eligible for 2078 a Family Empowerment Scholarship while he or she is: 2079 (a)âEnrolled full time in a public school, including, but 2080 not limited to, the Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind, 2081 the College-Preparatory Boarding Academy, the Florida Virtual 2082 School, the Florida Scholars Academy, a developmental research 2083 school authorized under s. 1002.32, or a charter school 2084 authorized under this chapter. For purposes of this paragraph, a 2085 3- or 4-year-old child who receives services funded through the 2086 Florida Education Finance Program is considered to be a student 2087 enrolled in a public school; 2088 (b)âEnrolled in a school operating for the purpose of 2089 providing educational services to youth in a Department of 2090 Juvenile Justice commitment program; 2091 (c)âReceiving any other educational scholarship pursuant to 2092 this chapter. However, an eligible public school student 2093 receiving a scholarship under s. 1002.411 may receive a stipend 2094 for transportation pursuant to s. 1002.31(7); 2095 (d)âNot having regular and direct contact with his or her 2096 private school teachers pursuant to s. 1002.421(9)(i) s. 2097 1002.421(1)(i), unless he or she is eligible pursuant to 2098 paragraph (3)(b) and enrolled in the participating private 2099 schoolâs transition-to-work program pursuant to subsection (16) 2100 or a home education program pursuant to s. 1002.41; 2101 (e)âParticipating in a private tutoring program pursuant to 2102 s. 1002.43 unless he or she is determined eligible pursuant to 2103 paragraph (3)(b); or 2104 (f)âParticipating in virtual instruction pursuant to s. 2105 1002.455 that receives state funding pursuant to the studentâs 2106 participation. 2107 (7)âSCHOOL DISTRICT OBLIGATIONS.â 2108 (a)âBy January 1 of each year, a school district shall 2109 inform all households within the district receiving free or 2110 reduced-priced meals under the National School Lunch Act of 2111 their eligibility to apply to the department for a Family 2112 Empowerment Scholarship. The form of such notice shall be 2113 provided by the department, and the school district shall 2114 include the provided form in any normal correspondence with 2115 eligible households. Such notice is limited to once a year. 2116 (b)1.âThe parent of a student with a disability who does 2117 not have an IEP in accordance with subparagraph (3)(b)4. or who 2118 seeks a reevaluation of an existing IEP may request an IEP 2119 meeting and evaluation from the school district in order to 2120 obtain or revise a matrix of services. The school district shall 2121 notify a parent who has made a request for an IEP that the 2122 district is required to complete the IEP and matrix of services 2123 within 60 30 days after receiving notice of the parentâs 2124 request. The school district shall conduct a meeting and develop 2125 an IEP and a matrix of services within 60 30 days after receipt 2126 of the parentâs request in accordance with State Board of 2127 Education rules. The district must accept the diagnosis and 2128 consider the service plan of the licensed professional providing 2129 the diagnosis pursuant to subparagraph (3)(b)4. The school 2130 district must complete a matrix that assigns the student to one 2131 of the levels of service as they existed before the 2000-2001 2132 school year. For a nonpublic school student without an IEP, the 2133 school district is authorized to use evaluation reports and 2134 plans of care developed by the licensed professionals under 2135 subparagraph (4)(b)3. to complete the matrix of services. 2136 2.a.âThe school district must provide the studentâs parent 2137 and the department with the studentâs matrix level within 10 2138 calendar days after its completion. 2139 b.âThe department shall notify the parent and the 2140 organization of the amount of the funds awarded within 10 days 2141 after receiving the school districtâs notification of the 2142 studentâs matrix level. 2143 c.âA school district may change a matrix of services only 2144 if the change is a result of an IEP reevaluation or to correct a 2145 technical, typographical, or calculation error. 2146 (b)1.(c)1.âWithin 10 days after an IEP meeting is held, a 2147 school district shall notify the parent of a student of all 2148 options available pursuant to this section and offer that 2149 studentâs parent an opportunity to enroll the student in another 2150 public school in the school district. 2151 2.âThe parent is not required to accept the offer of 2152 enrolling the student in another public school in lieu of 2153 requesting a scholarship. However, if the parent chooses the 2154 public school option, the student may continue attending the 2155 public school chosen by the parent until the student graduates 2156 from high school. 2157 3.âThe parent may choose another public school in the 2158 school district, and the school district shall provide 2159 transportation to the public school selected by the parent. 2160 4.âThe parent may choose, as an alternative, to enroll the 2161 student in and transport the student to a public school in an 2162 adjacent school district that has available space and has a 2163 program with the services agreed to in the studentâs IEP already 2164 in place, and that school district shall accept the student and 2165 report the student for purposes of the school districtâs funding 2166 pursuant to the Florida Education Finance Program. 2167 (d)âUpon the request of the department, a school district 2168 shall coordinate with the department to provide to a 2169 participating private school the statewide assessments 2170 administered under s. 1008.22 and any related materials for 2171 administering the assessments. For a student who participates in 2172 the Family Empowerment Scholarship Program whose parent requests 2173 that the student take the statewide assessments under s. 2174 1008.22, the district in which the student attends a 2175 participating private school shall provide locations and times 2176 to take all statewide assessments. A school district is 2177 responsible for implementing test administrations at a 2178 participating private school, including the: 2179 1.âProvision of training for private school staff on test 2180 security and assessment administration procedures; 2181 2.âDistribution of testing materials to a private school; 2182 3.âRetrieval of testing materials from a private school; 2183 4.âProvision of the required format for a private school to 2184 submit information to the district for test administration and 2185 enrollment purposes; and 2186 5.âProvision of any required assistance, monitoring, or 2187 investigation at a private school. 2188 (e)âEach school district must publish information about the 2189 Family Empowerment Scholarship Program on the districtâs website 2190 homepage. At a minimum, the published information must include a 2191 website link to the Family Empowerment Scholarship Program 2192 published on the Department of Education website as well as a 2193 telephone number and e-mail that students and parents may use to 2194 contact relevant personnel in the school district to obtain 2195 information about the scholarship. 2196 (8)âDEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OBLIGATIONS.â 2197 (a)âThe department shall: 2198 1.âPublish and update, as necessary, information on the 2199 department website about the Family Empowerment Scholarship 2200 Program, including, but not limited to, student eligibility 2201 criteria, parental responsibilities, and relevant data. 2202 2.âReport, as part of the determination of full-time 2203 equivalent membership pursuant to s. 1011.62(1)(a), all 2204 scholarship students funded through the Florida Education 2205 Finance Program, and cross-check the list of scholarship 2206 students submitted by the eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 2207 organization with the full-time equivalent student membership 2208 survey data to avoid duplication. 2209 3.âMaintain and annually publish a list of nationally norm 2210 referenced tests identified for purposes of satisfying the 2211 testing requirement in subparagraph (9)(c)1. The tests must meet 2212 industry standards of quality in accordance with state board 2213 rule. 2214 4.âNotify eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 2215 organizations of the deadlines for submitting the verified list 2216 of eligible scholarship students. 2217 (a)5.âDeny or terminate program participation upon a 2218 parentâs failure to comply with the scholarship program 2219 requirements subsection (10). 2220 6.âNotify the parent and the organization when a 2221 scholarship account is closed and program funds revert to the 2222 state. 2223 7.âNotify an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 2224 organization of any of the organizationâs or other 2225 organizationâs identified students who are receiving 2226 scholarships under this chapter. 2227 (b)8.âMaintain on its website a list of approved providers 2228 as required by s. 1002.66, eligible postsecondary educational 2229 institutions, eligible private schools, and eligible 2230 organizations and may identify or provide links to lists of 2231 other approved providers. 2232 9.âRequire each organization to verify eligible 2233 expenditures before the distribution of funds for any 2234 expenditures made pursuant to subparagraphs (4)(b)1. and 2. 2235 Review of expenditures made for services specified in 2236 subparagraphs (4)(b)3.-15. may be completed after the purchase 2237 is made. 2238 (c)10.âInvestigate any written complaint of a violation of 2239 this section by a parent, a student, a participating private 2240 school, a public school, a school district, an organization, a 2241 provider, or another appropriate party in accordance with the 2242 process established under s. 1002.421. 2243 (d)11.âRequire quarterly reports by an organization, which 2244 must include, at a minimum, the number of students participating 2245 in the program; the demographics of program participants; the 2246 disability category of program participants; the matrix level of 2247 services, if known; the program award amount per student; the 2248 total expenditures for the purposes specified in paragraph 2249 (4)(b); the types of providers of services to students; the 2250 number of scholarship applications received, the number of 2251 applications processed within 30 days after receipt, and the 2252 number of incomplete applications received; data related to 2253 reimbursement submissions, including the average number of days 2254 for a reimbursement to be reviewed and the average number of 2255 days for a reimbursement to be approved; any parent input and 2256 feedback collected regarding the program; and any other 2257 information deemed necessary by the department. 2258 12.âNotify eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 2259 organizations that scholarships may not be awarded in a school 2260 district in which the award will exceed 99 percent of the school 2261 districtâs share of state funding through the Florida Education 2262 Finance Program as calculated by the department. 2263 13.âAdjust payments to eligible nonprofit scholarship 2264 funding organizations and, when the Florida Education Finance 2265 Program is recalculated, adjust the amount of state funds 2266 allocated to school districts through the Florida Education 2267 Finance Program based upon the results of the cross-check 2268 completed pursuant to subparagraph 2. 2269 (b)âAt the direction of the Commissioner of Education, the 2270 department may: 2271 1.âSuspend or revoke program participation or use of 2272 program funds by the student or participation or eligibility of 2273 an organization, eligible postsecondary educational institution, 2274 approved provider, or other party for a violation of this 2275 section. 2276 2.âDetermine the length of, and conditions for lifting, a 2277 suspension or revocation specified in this paragraph. 2278 3.âRecover unexpended program funds or withhold payment of 2279 an equal amount of program funds to recover program funds that 2280 were not authorized for use. 2281 2282 In determining whether to suspend or revoke participation or 2283 lift a suspension or revocation in accordance with this 2284 paragraph, the department may consider factors that include, but 2285 are not limited to, acts or omissions that led to a previous 2286 suspension or revocation of participation in a state or federal 2287 program or an education scholarship program; failure to 2288 reimburse the organization for funds improperly received or 2289 retained; failure to reimburse government funds improperly 2290 received or retained; imposition of a prior criminal sanction 2291 related to the person or entity or its officers or employees; 2292 imposition of a civil fine or administrative fine, license 2293 revocation or suspension, or program eligibility suspension, 2294 termination, or revocation related to a personâs or entityâs 2295 management or operation; or other types of criminal proceedings 2296 in which the person or entity or its officers or employees were 2297 found guilty of, regardless of adjudication, or entered a plea 2298 of nolo contendere or guilty to, any offense involving fraud, 2299 deceit, dishonesty, or moral turpitude. 2300 (e)(c)âThe department shall Notify each school district of 2301 the full-time equivalent student consensus estimate of students 2302 participating in the program developed pursuant to s. 2303 216.136(4)(a). 2304 (f)(d)âThe department may Provide guidance to a 2305 participating private school that submits a transition-to-work 2306 program plan pursuant to subsection (15) (16). 2307 (g)âDevelop guidance for students eligible pursuant to 2308 paragraph (3)(b) which details the available transition 2309 services, including postsecondary education, employment, and 2310 independent living, for which scholarship funds may be used. 2311 (9)âPRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.âTo be 2312 eligible to participate in the Family Empowerment Scholarship 2313 Program, a private school may be sectarian or nonsectarian and 2314 must: 2315 (a)âComply with all requirements for private schools 2316 participating in state school choice scholarship programs 2317 pursuant to s. 1002.421. 2318 (b)âProvide to the organization all documentation required 2319 for a studentâs participation, including confirmation of the 2320 studentâs admission to the private school, the private schoolâs 2321 and studentâs fee schedules, and any other information required 2322 by the organization to process scholarship payment under 2323 subparagraph (12)(a)3. Such information must be provided by the 2324 deadlines established by the organization and in accordance with 2325 the requirements of this section. A student is not eligible to 2326 receive a quarterly scholarship payment if the private school 2327 fails to meet the deadline. 2328 (c)1.âAnnually administer or make provision for students 2329 participating in the program in grades 3 through 10 to take one 2330 of the nationally norm-referenced tests that are identified by 2331 the department pursuant to paragraph (8)(a) or to take the 2332 statewide assessments pursuant to s. 1008.22. Students with 2333 disabilities for whom the physician or psychologist who issued 2334 the diagnosis or the IEP team determines that standardized 2335 testing is not appropriate are exempt from this requirement. A 2336 participating private school shall report a studentâs scores to 2337 his or her parent. By August 15 of each year, a participating 2338 private school must report the scores of all participating 2339 students to a state university as described in s. 2340 1002.395(9)(f). 2341 2.âAdminister the statewide assessments pursuant to s. 2342 1008.22 if the private school chooses to offer the statewide 2343 assessments. A participating private school may choose to offer 2344 and administer the statewide assessments to all students who 2345 attend the private school in grades 3 through 10 and must submit 2346 a request in writing to the department by March 1 of each year 2347 in order to administer the statewide assessments in the 2348 subsequent school year. 2349 (d)âFor a student determined eligible pursuant to paragraph 2350 (3)(b), discuss the schoolâs academic programs and policies, 2351 specialized services, code of conduct, and attendance policies 2352 before enrollment with the parent to determine which programs 2353 and services may meet the studentâs individual needs. 2354 2355 If a private school fails to meet the requirements of this 2356 subsection or s. 1002.421, the commissioner may determine that 2357 the private school is ineligible to participate in the 2358 scholarship program. 2359 (9)(10)âPARENT AND STUDENT RESPONSIBILITIES FOR PROGRAM 2360 PARTICIPATION.â 2361 (a)âA parent who applies for a scholarship under paragraph 2362 (3)(a) whose student will be enrolled full time in an eligible 2363 private school must: 2364 1.âSelect an eligible private school and apply for the 2365 admission of his or her student. 2366 2.âRequest the scholarship by the date established by the 2367 organization in a manner that creates a written or electronic 2368 record of the request and the date of receipt of the request. 2369 3.a.âBeginning with new applications for the 2025-2026 2370 school year and thereafter, notify the organization by December 2371 15 that the scholarship is being accepted or declined. 2372 b.âBeginning with renewal applications for the 2025-2026 2373 school year and thereafter, notify the organization by May 31 2374 that the scholarship is being renewed or declined. 2375 4.âInform the applicable school district when the parent 2376 withdraws his or her student from a public school to attend an 2377 eligible private school using the standard withdrawal form 2378 developed by the department pursuant to s. 1002.421. 2379 3.5.âRequire his or her student participating in the 2380 program to remain in attendance at the eligible private school 2381 throughout the school year unless excused by the school for 2382 illness or other good cause. 2383 4.6.âMeet with the eligible private schoolâs principal or 2384 the principalâs designee to review the schoolâs academic 2385 programs and policies, specialized services, code of student 2386 conduct, and attendance policies before enrollment. 2387 7.âRequire his or her student participating in the program 2388 to take the norm-referenced assessment offered by the eligible 2389 private school. The parent may also choose to have the student 2390 participate in the statewide assessments pursuant to paragraph 2391 (7)(d). If the parent requests that the student participating in 2392 the program take all statewide assessments required pursuant to 2393 s. 1008.22, the parent is responsible for transporting the 2394 student to the assessment site designated by the school 2395 district. 2396 8.âApprove each payment before the scholarship funds may be 2397 deposited by funds transfer pursuant to subparagraph (12)(a)3. 2398 The parent may not designate any entity or individual associated 2399 with the participating private school as the parentâs attorney 2400 in fact to approve a funds transfer. A participant who fails to 2401 comply with this paragraph forfeits the scholarship. 2402 9.âAgree to have the organization commit scholarship funds 2403 on behalf of his or her student for tuition and fees for which 2404 the parent is responsible for payment at the eligible private 2405 school before using scholarship account funds for additional 2406 authorized uses under paragraph (4)(a). A parent is responsible 2407 for all eligible expenses in excess of the amount of the 2408 scholarship. 2409 10.âComply with the scholarship application and renewal 2410 processes and requirements established by the organization. 2411 (b)âA parent who applies for a scholarship under paragraph 2412 (3)(b) is exercising his or her parental option to determine the 2413 appropriate placement or the services that best meet the needs 2414 of his or her child and must: 2415 1.âApply to an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 2416 organization to participate in the program by a date set by the 2417 organization. The request must be communicated directly to the 2418 organization in a manner that creates a written or electronic 2419 record of the request and the date of receipt of the request. 2420 2.a.âBeginning with new applications for the 2025-2026 2421 school year and thereafter, notify the organization by December 2422 15 that the scholarship is being accepted or declined. 2423 b.âBeginning with renewal applications for the 2025-2026 2424 school year and thereafter, notify the organization by May 31 2425 that the scholarship is being renewed or declined. 2426 3.âsign an agreement with the organization and annually 2427 submit a sworn compliance statement to the organization to 2428 satisfy or maintain program eligibility, including eligibility 2429 to receive and spend program payments by: 2430 1.a.âAffirming that the student is enrolled in a program 2431 that meets regular school attendance requirements as provided in 2432 s. 1003.01(16)(b), (c), or (d). 2433 2.b.âAffirming that the program funds are used only for 2434 authorized purposes serving the studentâs educational needs, as 2435 described in paragraph (4)(b); that any prepaid college plan or 2436 college savings plan funds contributed pursuant to subparagraph 2437 (4)(b)7. subparagraph (4)(b)6. will not be transferred to 2438 another beneficiary while the plan contains funds contributed 2439 pursuant to this section; and that they will not receive a 2440 payment, refund, or rebate of any funds provided under this 2441 section. 2442 3.c.âAffirming that the parent is responsible for all 2443 eligible expenses in excess of the amount of the scholarship and 2444 for the education of his or her student by, as applicable: 2445 a.(I)âRequiring the student to take an assessment in 2446 accordance with s. 1002.421(7) paragraph (9)(c); 2447 b.(II)âProviding an annual evaluation in accordance with s. 2448 1002.41(1)(f); or 2449 c.(III)âRequiring the child to take any preassessments and 2450 postassessments selected by the provider if the child is 4 years 2451 of age and is enrolled in a program provided by an eligible 2452 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program provider. A student 2453 with disabilities for whom the physician or psychologist who 2454 issued the diagnosis or the IEP team determines that a 2455 preassessment and postassessment is not appropriate is exempt 2456 from this requirement. A participating provider shall report a 2457 studentâs scores to the parent. 2458 4.d.âAffirming that the student remains in good standing 2459 with the provider or school if those options are selected by the 2460 parent. 2461 5.e.âEnrolling his or her child in a program from a 2462 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program provider authorized 2463 under s. 1002.55, a school readiness provider authorized under 2464 s. 1002.88, a prekindergarten program offered by an eligible 2465 private school, or an eligible private school if selected by the 2466 parent. 2467 6.f.âComply with the scholarship application and renewal 2468 processes and requirements established by the organization. A 2469 student whose participation in the program is not renewed may 2470 continue to spend scholarship funds that are in his or her 2471 account from prior years unless the account must be closed 2472 pursuant to subparagraph (5)(b)3. Notwithstanding any changes to 2473 the studentâs IEP, a student who was previously eligible for 2474 participation in the program shall remain eligible to apply for 2475 renewal. However, for a high-risk child to continue to 2476 participate in the program in the school year after he or she 2477 reaches 6 years of age, the childâs application for renewal of 2478 program participation must contain documentation that the child 2479 has a disability defined in paragraph (2)(e) other than high 2480 risk status. 2481 7.g.âProcuring the services necessary to educate the 2482 student. 2483 a.âIf such services include enrollment in an eligible 2484 private school, the parent must meet with the private schoolâs 2485 principal or the principalâs designee to review the schoolâs 2486 academic programs and policies, specialized services, code of 2487 student conduct, and attendance policies before his or her 2488 student is enrolled. The parent must also approve each payment 2489 to the eligible private school before the scholarship funds may 2490 be deposited by funds transfer pursuant to subparagraph 2491 (12)(a)3. The parent may not designate any entity or individual 2492 associated with the eligible private school as the parentâs 2493 attorney in fact to approve a funds transfer. When the student 2494 receives a scholarship, the district school board is not 2495 obligated to provide the student with a free appropriate public 2496 education. For purposes of s. 1003.57 and the Individuals with 2497 Disabilities in Education Act, a participating student has only 2498 those rights that apply to all other unilaterally parentally 2499 placed students, except that, when requested by the parent, 2500 school district personnel must develop an IEP or matrix level of 2501 services. 2502 b.âIf such services include enrollment in Florida Virtual 2503 School as a private paying student, the parent must agree to 2504 have the organization commit scholarship funds on behalf of his 2505 or her student for tuition and fees for which the parent is 2506 responsible for payment to the Florida Virtual School before 2507 using scholarship account funds for additional uses under 2508 paragraph (4)(b). 2509 (c)âA parent may not apply for multiple scholarships under 2510 this section and s. 1002.395 for an individual student at the 2511 same time. 2512 (d)âA participant who fails to comply with this subsection 2513 forfeits the scholarship. 2514 (10)(11)âOBLIGATIONS OF ELIGIBLE SCHOLARSHIP-FUNDING 2515 ORGANIZATIONS.â 2516 (a)âAn eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization 2517 awarding scholarships to eligible students pursuant to this 2518 section paragraph (3)(a) shall: 2519 1.âEstablish a process for parents who are in compliance 2520 with paragraph (10)(a) to renew their studentsâ scholarships. 2521 Renewal applications for the 2025-2026 school year and 2522 thereafter must provide for a renewal timeline beginning 2523 February 1 of the prior school year and ending April 30 of the 2524 prior school year. A studentâs renewal is contingent upon an 2525 eligible private school providing confirmation of student 2526 admission pursuant to subsection (9). The process must require 2527 that parents confirm that the scholarship is being renewed or 2528 declined by May 31. 2529 2.âEstablish a process that allows a parent to apply for a 2530 new scholarship. The process may begin no earlier than February 2531 1 of the prior school year and must authorize submission of 2532 applications until November 15. The process must be in a manner 2533 that creates a written or electronic record of the application 2534 request and the date of receipt of the application request. 2535 Applications received after the deadline may be considered for 2536 scholarship award in the subsequent fiscal year. The process 2537 must require that parents confirm that the scholarship is being 2538 accepted or declined by December 15. 2539 (a)3.âVerify the household income level of students seeking 2540 priority eligibility and submit the verified list of students to 2541 the department. 2542 4.âAward scholarships in priority order pursuant to 2543 paragraph (3)(a). 2544 5.âEstablish and maintain separate scholarship accounts for 2545 each eligible student. For each account, the organization must 2546 maintain a record of accrued interest that is retained in the 2547 studentâs account and available only for authorized program 2548 expenditures. 2549 6.âPermit eligible students to use program funds for the 2550 purposes specified in paragraph (4)(a), as authorized in the 2551 organizationâs purchasing handbook, by paying for the authorized 2552 use directly, then submitting a reimbursement request to the 2553 eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization. However, an 2554 eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization may require 2555 the use of an online platform for direct purchases of products 2556 so long as such use does not limit a parentâs choice of 2557 curriculum or academic programs. If a parent purchases a product 2558 identical to one offered by an organizationâs online platform 2559 for a lower price, the organization must reimburse the parent 2560 the cost of the product. 2561 7.âIn a timely manner, submit the verified list of students 2562 and any information requested by the department relating to the 2563 scholarship under this section. 2564 8.âNotify the department about any violation of this 2565 section. 2566 9.âDocument each studentâs eligibility for a fiscal year 2567 before granting a scholarship for that fiscal year. A student is 2568 ineligible for a scholarship if the studentâs account has been 2569 inactive for 2 consecutive fiscal years. 2570 10.âNotify each parent that participation in the 2571 scholarship program does not guarantee enrollment. 2572 11.âCommit scholarship funds on behalf of the student for 2573 tuition and fees for which the parent is responsible for payment 2574 at the participating private school before using scholarship 2575 account funds for additional authorized uses under paragraph 2576 (4)(a). 2577 (b)âFor students An eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 2578 organization awarding scholarships to eligible students pursuant 2579 to paragraph (3)(b) shall: 2580 1.âEstablish a process for parents who are in compliance 2581 with paragraph (10)(b) to renew their studentsâ scholarships. 2582 Renewal applications for the 2025-2026 school year and 2583 thereafter must provide for a renewal timeline beginning 2584 February 1 of the prior school year and ending April 30 of the 2585 prior school year. A studentâs renewal is contingent upon an 2586 eligible private school providing confirmation of student 2587 admission pursuant to subsection (9), if applicable. The process 2588 must require that parents confirm that the scholarship is being 2589 renewed or declined by May 31. 2590 2.âEstablish a process that allows a parent to apply for a 2591 new scholarship. The process may begin no earlier than February 2592 1 of the prior school year and must authorize the submission of 2593 applications until November 15. The process must be in a manner 2594 that creates a written or electronic record of the application 2595 request and the date of receipt of the application request. 2596 Applications received after the deadline may be considered for 2597 scholarship award in the subsequent fiscal year. The process 2598 must require that parents confirm that the scholarship is being 2599 accepted or declined by December 15. 2600 3.âReview applications and award scholarships using the 2601 following priorities: 2602 a.âRenewing students from the previous school year. 2603 b.âAn eligible student who meets the criteria for an 2604 initial award pursuant to paragraph (3)(b) on a first-come, 2605 first-served basis. 2606 4.âEstablish and maintain separate accounts for each 2607 eligible student. For each account, the organization must 2608 maintain a record of accrued interest that is retained in the 2609 studentâs account and available only for authorized program 2610 expenditures. 2611 5.âVerify qualifying educational expenditures pursuant to 2612 the requirements of paragraph (4)(b). 2613 6.âReturn any remaining program funds to the department 2614 pursuant to paragraph (6)(b). 2615 7.âNotify the parent about the availability of, and the 2616 requirements associated with requesting, an initial IEP or IEP 2617 reevaluation every 3 years for each student participating in the 2618 program. 2619 2.8.âNotify the parent of available state and local 2620 services, including, but not limited to, services under chapter 2621 413. 2622 9.âIn a timely manner, submit to the department the 2623 verified list of eligible scholarship students and any 2624 information requested by the department relating to the 2625 scholarship under this section. 2626 (c)10.âNotify the department of any violation of this 2627 section. 2628 11.âDocument each scholarship studentâs eligibility for a 2629 fiscal year before granting a scholarship for that fiscal year 2630 pursuant to paragraph (3)(b). A student is ineligible for a 2631 scholarship if the studentâs account has been inactive for 2 2632 consecutive fiscal years. 2633 (d)(c)âAn eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 2634 organization may, from eligible contributions received pursuant 2635 to s. 1002.395(6)(l)1., Use an amount, from eligible 2636 contributions received pursuant to s. 1002.395(6)(l)1., not to 2637 exceed 1.5 2.5 percent of the total amount of all verified 2638 eligible scholarships funded under this section for 2639 administrative expenses associated with performing functions 2640 under this section. An organization that, for the prior fiscal 2641 year, has complied with the expenditure requirements of s. 2642 1002.395(6)(i)3. s. 1002.395(6)(l)3. may use an amount not to 2643 exceed 2 3 percent. Such administrative expense amount is 2644 considered within the 2-percent 3-percent limit on the total 2645 amount an organization may use to administer scholarships under 2646 this chapter. 2647 (d)âAn eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization 2648 shall establish a process to collect input and feedback from 2649 parents, private schools, and providers before implementing 2650 substantial modifications or enhancements to the reimbursement 2651 process. 2652 (11)(12)âSCHOLARSHIP FUNDING AND PAYMENT.â 2653 (a)1.âThe calculated scholarship amount for a participating 2654 student determined eligible pursuant to paragraph (3)(a) shall 2655 be based upon the grade level and school district in which the 2656 student was assigned as 100 percent of the funds per unweighted 2657 full-time equivalent in the Florida Education Finance Program 2658 for a student in the basic program established pursuant to s. 2659 1011.62(1)(c)1., plus a per-full-time equivalent share of funds 2660 for the categorical programs established in s. 1011.62(5), 2661 (7)(a), and (16), as funded in the General Appropriations Act. 2662 2.a.âFor renewing scholarship students, the organization 2663 must verify the studentâs continued eligibility to participate 2664 in the scholarship program at least 30 days before each payment. 2665 Upon receiving the verified list of eligible scholarship 2666 students, the department shall release, from state funds only, 2667 the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph 1. to the 2668 organization for deposit into the studentâs account in quarterly 2669 payments no later than August 1, November 1, February 1, and 2670 April 1 of each school year in which the scholarship is in 2671 force. 2672 b.âFor new scholarship students, the organization must 2673 verify the studentâs eligibility to participate in the 2674 scholarship program at least 30 days before each payment. Upon 2675 receiving the verified list of eligible scholarship students, 2676 the department shall release, from state funds only, the amount 2677 calculated pursuant to subparagraph 1. to the organization for 2678 deposit into the studentâs account in quarterly payments no 2679 later than September 1, November 1, February 1, and April 1 of 2680 each school year in which the scholarship is in force. For a 2681 student exiting a Department of Juvenile Justice commitment 2682 program who chooses to participate in the scholarship program, 2683 the amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph 1. must be 2684 transferred from the school district in which the student last 2685 attended a public school before commitment to the Department of 2686 Juvenile Justice. 2687 c.âThe department is authorized to release the state funds 2688 contingent upon verification that the organization will comply 2689 with s. 1002.395(6)(l) based upon the organizationâs submitted 2690 verified list of eligible scholarship students pursuant to s. 2691 1002.395. 2692 3.âThe initial payment shall be made after the 2693 organizationâs verification of admission acceptance, and 2694 subsequent payments shall be made upon verification of continued 2695 enrollment and attendance at the participating private school. 2696 Payments for tuition and fees for full-time enrollment shall be 2697 made within 7 business days after approval by the parent 2698 pursuant to paragraph (10)(a) and the private school pursuant to 2699 paragraph (9)(b). Payment must be by funds transfer or any other 2700 means of payment that the department deems to be commercially 2701 viable or cost-effective. An organization shall ensure that the 2702 parent has approved a funds transfer before any scholarship 2703 funds are deposited. 2704 4.âAn organization may not transfer any funds to an account 2705 of a student determined eligible pursuant to paragraph (3)(a) 2706 which has a balance in excess of $24,000. 2707 (b)1.âFor the 2024-2025 school year, the maximum number of 2708 scholarships funded under paragraph (3)(b) shall be 72,615. 2709 Beginning in the 2025-2026 school year, the maximum number of 2710 scholarships funded under paragraph (3)(b) shall annually 2711 increase by 5 percent of the stateâs total exceptional student 2712 education full-time equivalent student membership, not including 2713 gifted students. The maximum number of scholarships funded shall 2714 increase by 1 percent of the stateâs total exceptional student 2715 education full-time equivalent student membership, not including 2716 gifted students, in the school year following any school year in 2717 which the number of scholarships funded exceeds 95 percent of 2718 the number of available scholarships for that school year. An 2719 eligible student who meets any of the following requirements 2720 shall be excluded from the maximum number of students if the 2721 student: 2722 (a)a.âReceived specialized instructional services under the 2723 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program pursuant to s. 2724 1002.66 during the previous school year and the student has a 2725 current IEP developed by the district school board in accordance 2726 with rules of the State Board of Education; 2727 (b)b.âIs a dependent child of a law enforcement officer or 2728 a member of the United States Armed Forces, a foster child, or 2729 an adopted child; or 2730 (c)c.âSpent the prior school year in attendance at a 2731 Florida public school or the Florida School for the Deaf and the 2732 Blind. For purposes of this paragraph subparagraph, the term 2733 âprior school year in attendanceâ means that the student was 2734 enrolled and reported by: 2735 1.(I)âA school district for funding during either the 2736 preceding October or February full-time equivalent student 2737 membership surveys in kindergarten through grade 12, which 2738 includes time spent in a Department of Juvenile Justice 2739 commitment program if funded under the Florida Education Finance 2740 Program; 2741 2.(II)âThe Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind during 2742 the preceding October or February full-time equivalent student 2743 membership surveys in kindergarten through grade 12; 2744 3.(III)âA school district for funding during the preceding 2745 October or February full-time equivalent student membership 2746 surveys, was at least 4 years of age when enrolled and reported, 2747 and was eligible for services under s. 1003.21(1)(e); or 2748 4.(IV)âReceived a John M. McKay Scholarship for Students 2749 with Disabilities in the 2021-2022 school year. 2750 2.âFor a student who has a Level I to Level III matrix of 2751 services or a diagnosis by a physician or psychologist, the 2752 calculated scholarship amount for a student participating in the 2753 program must be based upon the grade level and school district 2754 in which the student would have been enrolled as the total funds 2755 per unweighted full-time equivalent in the Florida Education 2756 Finance Program for a student in the basic exceptional student 2757 education program pursuant to s. 1011.62(1)(c) and (d), plus a 2758 per full-time equivalent share of funds for the categorical 2759 programs established in s. 1011.62(5), (7)(a), (8), and (16), as 2760 funded in the General Appropriations Act. For the categorical 2761 program established in s. 1011.62(8), the funds must be 2762 allocated based on the school districtâs average exceptional 2763 student education guaranteed allocation funds per exceptional 2764 student education full-time equivalent student. 2765 3.âFor a student with a Level IV or Level V matrix of 2766 services, the calculated scholarship amount must be based upon 2767 the school district to which the student would have been 2768 assigned as the total funds per full-time equivalent for the 2769 Level IV or Level V exceptional student education program 2770 pursuant to s. 1011.62(1)(c)2.a. or b., plus a per-full time 2771 equivalent share of funds for the categorical programs 2772 established in s. 1011.62(5), (7)(a), and (16), as funded in the 2773 General Appropriations Act. 2774 4.âFor a student who received a Gardiner Scholarship 2775 pursuant to former s. 1002.385 in the 2020-2021 school year, the 2776 amount shall be the greater of the amount calculated pursuant to 2777 subparagraph 2. or the amount the student received for the 2020 2778 2021 school year. 2779 5.âFor a student who received a John M. McKay Scholarship 2780 pursuant to former s. 1002.39 in the 2020-2021 school year, the 2781 amount shall be the greater of the amount calculated pursuant to 2782 subparagraph 2. or the amount the student received for the 2020 2783 2021 school year. 2784 6.âThe organization must verify the studentâs eligibility 2785 to participate in the scholarship program at least 30 days 2786 before each payment. 2787 7.a.âFor renewing scholarship students, upon receiving the 2788 verified list of eligible scholarship students, the department 2789 shall release, from state funds only, the amount calculated 2790 pursuant to subparagraph 1. to the organization for deposit into 2791 the studentâs account in quarterly payments no later than August 2792 1, November 1, February 1, and April 1 of each school year in 2793 which the scholarship is in force. 2794 b.âFor new scholarship students, upon receiving the 2795 verified list of eligible scholarship students, the department 2796 shall release, from state funds only, the amount calculated 2797 pursuant to subparagraph 1. to the organization for deposit into 2798 the studentâs account in quarterly payments no later than 2799 September 1, November 1, February 1, and April 1 of each school 2800 year in which the scholarship is in force. 2801 8.âIf a scholarship student is attending an eligible 2802 private school full time, the initial payment shall be made 2803 after the organizationâs verification of admission acceptance, 2804 and subsequent payments shall be made upon verification of 2805 continued enrollment and attendance at the eligible private 2806 school. Payments for tuition and fees for full-time enrollment 2807 shall be made within 7 business days after approval by the 2808 parent pursuant to paragraph (10)(b) and the private school 2809 pursuant to paragraph (9)(b). 2810 9.âAccrued interest in the studentâs account is in addition 2811 to, and not part of, the awarded funds. Program funds include 2812 both the awarded funds and accrued interest. 2813 10.âThe organization may develop a system for payment of 2814 benefits by funds transfer, including, but not limited to, debit 2815 cards, electronic payment cards, or any other means of payment 2816 which the department deems to be commercially viable or cost 2817 effective. A studentâs scholarship award may not be reduced for 2818 debit card or electronic payment fees. Commodities or services 2819 related to the development of such a system must be procured by 2820 competitive solicitation unless they are purchased from a state 2821 term contract pursuant to s. 287.056. 2822 11.âAn organization may not transfer any funds to an 2823 account of a student determined to be eligible pursuant to 2824 paragraph (3)(b) which has a balance in excess of $50,000. 2825 12.âMoneys received pursuant to this section do not 2826 constitute taxable income to the qualified student or the parent 2827 of the qualified student. 2828 (c)âAn organization may not submit a new scholarship 2829 student for funding after February 1. 2830 (d)âWithin 30 days after the release of state funds 2831 pursuant to paragraphs (a) and (b), the eligible scholarship 2832 funding organization shall certify to the department the amount 2833 of funds distributed for student scholarships. If the amount of 2834 funds released by the department is more than the amount 2835 distributed by the organization, the department is authorized to 2836 adjust the amount of the overpayment in the subsequent quarterly 2837 payment release. 2838 Section 6.âSubsections (2), (3), (4), and (6) through (11) 2839 and paragraph (e) of subsection (15) of section 1002.395, 2840 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 2841 1002.395âFlorida Tax Credit Scholarship Program.â 2842 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 2843 (a)ââAnnual tax credit amountâ means, for any state fiscal 2844 year, the sum of the amount of tax credits approved under 2845 paragraph (5)(b), including tax credits to be taken under s. 2846 220.1875 or s. 624.51055, which are approved for a taxpayer 2847 whose taxable year begins on or after January 1 of the calendar 2848 year preceding the start of the applicable state fiscal year. 2849 (b)ââChoice navigatorâ means an individual who meets the 2850 requirements of sub-subparagraph (6)(d)4.g. and who provides 2851 consultations, at a mutually agreed upon location, on the 2852 selection of, application for, and enrollment in educational 2853 options addressing the academic needs of a student; curriculum 2854 selection; and advice on career and postsecondary education 2855 opportunities. However, nothing in this section authorizes a 2856 choice navigator to oversee or exercise control over the 2857 curricula or academic programs of a personalized education 2858 program. 2859 (c)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Revenue. 2860 (c)(d)ââDirect certification listâ means the certified list 2861 of children who qualify for the food assistance program, the 2862 Temporary Assistance to Needy Families Program, or the Food 2863 Distribution Program on Indian Reservations provided to the 2864 Department of Education by the Department of Children and 2865 Families. 2866 (d)(e)ââDivisionâ means the Division of Alcoholic Beverages 2867 and Tobacco of the Department of Business and Professional 2868 Regulation. 2869 (e)(f)ââEligible contributionâ means a monetary 2870 contribution from a taxpayer, subject to the restrictions 2871 provided in this section, to an eligible nonprofit scholarship 2872 funding organization pursuant to this section and ss. 212.099, 2873 212.1831, and 212.1832. The taxpayer making the contribution may 2874 not designate a specific child as the beneficiary of the 2875 contribution. 2876 (f)(g)ââEligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 2877 organizationâ means a state university; or an independent 2878 college or university that is eligible to participate in the 2879 William L. Boyd, IV, Effective Access to Student Education Grant 2880 Program, located and chartered in this state, is not for profit, 2881 and is accredited by the Commission on Colleges of the Southern 2882 Association of Colleges and Schools; or is a charitable 2883 organization that: 2884 1.âIs exempt from federal income tax pursuant to s. 2885 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; 2886 2.âIs a Florida entity formed under chapter 605, chapter 2887 607, or chapter 617 and whose principal office is located in the 2888 state; and 2889 3.âComplies with subsections (6) and (13) (15). 2890 (h)ââEligible postsecondary educational institutionâ means 2891 a Florida College System institution; a state university; a 2892 school district technical center; a school district adult 2893 general education center; an independent college or university 2894 eligible to participate in the William L. Boyd, IV, Effective 2895 Access to Student Education Grant Program under s. 1009.89; or 2896 an accredited independent postsecondary educational institution, 2897 as defined in s. 1005.02, which is licensed to operate in this 2898 state under part III of chapter 1005 or is approved to 2899 participate in a reciprocity agreement as defined in s. 2900 1000.35(2). 2901 (i)ââEligible private schoolâ means a private school, as 2902 defined in s. 1002.01, located in Florida which offers an 2903 education to students in any grades K-12 and that meets the 2904 requirements in subsection (8). 2905 (j)ââHousehold incomeâ has the same meaning as the term 2906 âincomeâ as defined in the Income Eligibility Guidelines for 2907 free and reduced price meals under the National School Lunch 2908 Program in 7 C.F.R. part 210 as published in the Federal 2909 Register by the United States Department of Agriculture. 2910 (k)ââOwner or operatorâ includes: 2911 1.âAn owner, president, officer, or director of an eligible 2912 nonprofit scholarship-funding organization or a person with 2913 equivalent decisionmaking authority over an eligible nonprofit 2914 scholarship-funding organization. 2915 2.âAn owner, operator, superintendent, or principal of an 2916 eligible private school or a person with equivalent 2917 decisionmaking authority over an eligible private school. 2918 (l)ââPersonalized education programâ has the same meaning 2919 as in s. 1002.01. 2920 (m)ââPersonalized education studentâ means a student whose 2921 parent applies to an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 2922 organization for participation in a personalized education 2923 program. 2924 (n)ââStudent learning planâ means a customized learning 2925 plan developed by a parent, at least annually, to guide 2926 instruction for his or her student and to identify the goods and 2927 services needed to address the academic needs of his or her 2928 student. 2929 (g)(o)ââTax credit cap amountâ means the maximum annual tax 2930 credit amount that the department may approve for a state fiscal 2931 year. 2932 (h)(p)ââUnweighted FTE funding amountâ means the statewide 2933 average total funds per unweighted full-time equivalent funding 2934 amount that is incorporated by reference in the General 2935 Appropriations Act, or any subsequent special appropriations 2936 act, for the applicable state fiscal year. 2937 (3)âPROGRAM; INITIAL SCHOLARSHIP ELIGIBILITY.â 2938 (a)âThe Florida Tax Credit Scholarship Program is 2939 established. 2940 (b)1.âA student is eligible for a Florida tax credit 2941 scholarship under this section if the student: 2942 (a)a.âIs a resident of this state or the dependent child of 2943 an active duty member of the United States Armed Forces who has 2944 received permanent change of station orders to this state or, at 2945 the time of renewal, whose home of record or state of legal 2946 residence is Florida; and 2947 (b)b.âIs eligible to enroll in kindergarten through grade 2948 12 in a public school in this state or received a scholarship 2949 under the former Hope Scholarship Program in the 2023-2024 2950 school year. 2951 2.âPriority must be given in the following order: 2952 a.âA student whose household income level does not exceed 2953 185 percent of the federal poverty level or who is in foster 2954 care or out-of-home care. 2955 b.âA student whose household income level exceeds 185 2956 percent of the federal poverty level, but does not exceed 400 2957 percent of the federal poverty level. 2958 (4)âSCHOLARSHIP PROHIBITIONS.âA student is not eligible for 2959 a scholarship while he or she is: 2960 (a)âEnrolled full time in a public school, including, but 2961 not limited to, the Florida School for the Deaf and the Blind, 2962 the College-Preparatory Boarding Academy, the Florida Virtual 2963 School, the Florida Scholars Academy, a developmental research 2964 school authorized under s. 1002.32, or a charter school 2965 authorized under this chapter. For purposes of this paragraph, a 2966 3- or 4-year-old child who receives services funded through the 2967 Florida Education Finance Program is considered a student 2968 enrolled full time in a public school; 2969 (b)âEnrolled in a school operating for the purpose of 2970 providing educational services to youth in a Department of 2971 Juvenile Justice commitment program; 2972 (c)âReceiving any other educational scholarship pursuant to 2973 this chapter. However, an eligible public school student 2974 receiving a scholarship under s. 1002.411 may receive a stipend 2975 for transportation pursuant to s. 1002.31(7); 2976 (d)âNot having regular and direct contact with his or her 2977 private school teachers pursuant to s. 1002.421(9)(i) s. 2978 1002.421(1)(i) unless he or she is enrolled in a personalized 2979 education program; 2980 (e)âParticipating in a home education program as defined in 2981 s. 1002.01(1); 2982 (f)âParticipating in a private tutoring program pursuant to 2983 s. 1002.43 unless he or she is enrolled in a personalized 2984 education program; or 2985 (g)âParticipating in virtual instruction pursuant to s. 2986 1002.455 that receives state funding pursuant to the studentâs 2987 participation. 2988 (6)âOBLIGATIONS OF ELIGIBLE NONPROFIT SCHOLARSHIP-FUNDING 2989 ORGANIZATIONS.âAn eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 2990 organization: 2991 (a)âMust comply with the antidiscrimination provisions of 2992 42 U.S.C. s. 2000d. 2993 (b)âMust comply with the following background check 2994 requirements: 2995 1.âAll owners and operators as defined in subparagraph 2996 (2)(k)1. are, before employment or engagement to provide 2997 services, subject to level 2 background screening as provided 2998 under chapter 435. The fingerprints for the background screening 2999 must be electronically submitted to the Department of Law 3000 Enforcement and can be taken by an authorized law enforcement 3001 agency or by an employee of the eligible nonprofit scholarship 3002 funding organization or a private company who is trained to take 3003 fingerprints. However, the complete set of fingerprints of an 3004 owner or operator may not be taken by the owner or operator. The 3005 results of the state and national criminal history check shall 3006 be provided to the Department of Education for screening under 3007 chapter 435. The cost of the background screening may be borne 3008 by the eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization or 3009 the owner or operator. 3010 2.âEvery 5 years following employment or engagement to 3011 provide services or association with an eligible nonprofit 3012 scholarship-funding organization, each owner or operator must 3013 meet level 2 screening standards as described in s. 435.04, at 3014 which time the nonprofit scholarship-funding organization shall 3015 request the Department of Law Enforcement to forward the 3016 fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for level 2 3017 screening. If the fingerprints of an owner or operator are not 3018 retained by the Department of Law Enforcement under subparagraph 3019 3., the owner or operator must electronically file a complete 3020 set of fingerprints with the Department of Law Enforcement. Upon 3021 submission of fingerprints for this purpose, the eligible 3022 nonprofit scholarship-funding organization shall request that 3023 the Department of Law Enforcement forward the fingerprints to 3024 the Federal Bureau of Investigation for level 2 screening, and 3025 the fingerprints shall be retained by the Department of Law 3026 Enforcement under subparagraph 3. 3027 3.âFingerprints submitted to the Department of Law 3028 Enforcement as required by this paragraph must be retained by 3029 the Department of Law Enforcement in a manner approved by rule 3030 and entered in the statewide automated biometric identification 3031 system authorized by s. 943.05(2)(b). The fingerprints must 3032 thereafter be available for all purposes and uses authorized for 3033 arrest fingerprints entered in the statewide automated biometric 3034 identification system pursuant to s. 943.051. 3035 4.âThe Department of Law Enforcement shall search all 3036 arrest fingerprints received under s. 943.051 against the 3037 fingerprints retained in the statewide automated biometric 3038 identification system under subparagraph 3. Any arrest record 3039 that is identified with an ownerâs or operatorâs fingerprints 3040 must be reported to the Department of Education. The Department 3041 of Education shall participate in this search process by paying 3042 an annual fee to the Department of Law Enforcement and by 3043 informing the Department of Law Enforcement of any change in the 3044 employment, engagement, or association status of the owners or 3045 operators whose fingerprints are retained under subparagraph 3. 3046 The Department of Law Enforcement shall adopt a rule setting the 3047 amount of the annual fee to be imposed upon the Department of 3048 Education for performing these services and establishing the 3049 procedures for the retention of owner and operator fingerprints 3050 and the dissemination of search results. The fee may be borne by 3051 the owner or operator of the nonprofit scholarship-funding 3052 organization. 3053 5.âA nonprofit scholarship-funding organization whose owner 3054 or operator fails the level 2 background screening is not 3055 eligible to provide scholarships under this section. 3056 6.âA nonprofit scholarship-funding organization whose owner 3057 or operator in the last 7 years has filed for personal 3058 bankruptcy or corporate bankruptcy in a corporation of which he 3059 or she owned more than 20 percent shall not be eligible to 3060 provide scholarships under this section. 3061 7.âIn addition to the offenses listed in s. 435.04, a 3062 person required to undergo background screening pursuant to this 3063 part or authorizing statutes must not have an arrest awaiting 3064 final disposition for, must not have been found guilty of, or 3065 entered a plea of nolo contendere to, regardless of 3066 adjudication, and must not have been adjudicated delinquent, and 3067 the record must not have been sealed or expunged for, any of the 3068 following offenses or any similar offense of another 3069 jurisdiction: 3070 a.âAny authorizing statutes, if the offense was a felony. 3071 b.âThis chapter, if the offense was a felony. 3072 c.âSection 409.920, relating to Medicaid provider fraud. 3073 d.âSection 409.9201, relating to Medicaid fraud. 3074 e.âSection 741.28, relating to domestic violence. 3075 f.âSection 817.034, relating to fraudulent acts through 3076 mail, wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic, or 3077 photooptical systems. 3078 g.âSection 817.234, relating to false and fraudulent 3079 insurance claims. 3080 h.âSection 817.505, relating to patient brokering. 3081 i.âSection 817.568, relating to criminal use of personal 3082 identification information. 3083 j.âSection 817.60, relating to obtaining a credit card 3084 through fraudulent means. 3085 k.âSection 817.61, relating to fraudulent use of credit 3086 cards, if the offense was a felony. 3087 l.âSection 831.01, relating to forgery. 3088 m.âSection 831.02, relating to uttering forged instruments. 3089 n.âSection 831.07, relating to forging bank bills, checks, 3090 drafts, or promissory notes. 3091 o.âSection 831.09, relating to uttering forged bank bills, 3092 checks, drafts, or promissory notes. 3093 p.âSection 831.30, relating to fraud in obtaining medicinal 3094 drugs. 3095 q.âSection 831.31, relating to the sale, manufacture, 3096 delivery, or possession with the intent to sell, manufacture, or 3097 deliver any counterfeit controlled substance, if the offense was 3098 a felony. 3099 (b)(c)âMust not have an owner or operator, as defined in 3100 subparagraph (2)(k)1., who owns or operates an eligible private 3101 school that is participating in the scholarship program. 3102 (c)(d)1.âFor the 2023-2024 school year, may fund no more 3103 than 20,000 scholarships for students who are enrolled pursuant 3104 to subsection (7) paragraph (7)(b). The number of scholarships 3105 funded for such students may increase by 40,000 in each 3106 subsequent school year. This paragraph subparagraph is repealed 3107 July 1, 2027. 3108 2.âShall establish a process for parents who are in 3109 compliance with paragraph (7)(a) to renew their studentsâ 3110 scholarships. Renewal applications for the 2025-2026 school year 3111 and thereafter must provide for a renewal timeline beginning 3112 February 1 of the prior school year and ending April 30 of the 3113 prior school year. A studentâs renewal is contingent upon an 3114 eligible private school providing confirmation of admission 3115 pursuant to subsection (8). The process must require that 3116 parents confirm that the scholarship is being renewed or 3117 declined by May 31. 3118 3.âShall establish a process that allows a parent to apply 3119 for a new scholarship. The process must be in a manner that 3120 creates a written or electronic record of the application 3121 request and the date of receipt of the application request. The 3122 process must require that parents confirm that the scholarship 3123 is being accepted or declined by a date set by the organization. 3124 4.âMust establish and maintain separate scholarship 3125 accounts from eligible contributions for each eligible student. 3126 For each account, the organization must maintain a record of 3127 accrued interest retained in the studentâs account. The 3128 organization 3129 (d)âMust verify that scholarship funds are used for: 3130 1.a.âTuition and fees for full-time or part-time enrollment 3131 in an eligible private school. 3132 2.b.âInstructional materials, including digital materials, 3133 digital devices, and Internet resources. 3134 3.c.âCurriculum as defined in s. 1002.394(2). 3135 4.d.âTuition and fees associated with full-time or part 3136 time enrollment in a home education instructional program that 3137 meets all of the following requirements: 3138 a.âProvides educational courses or activities. 3139 b.âHas a publicly available description of courses and 3140 activities. 3141 c.âHas a tuition and fee schedule. 3142 d.âMakes the tuition and fees payable to a registered 3143 business entity. 3144 5.âTuition and fees associated with full-time or part-time 3145 enrollment in; an eligible postsecondary educational institution 3146 or a program offered by the postsecondary educational 3147 institution, unless the program is subject to s. 1009.25 or 3148 reimbursed pursuant to s. 1009.30; an approved preapprenticeship 3149 program as defined in s. 446.021(5) which is not subject to s. 3150 1009.25 and complies with all applicable requirements of the 3151 Department of Education pursuant to chapter 1005; a private 3152 tutoring program authorized under s. 1002.43; a virtual program 3153 offered by a department-approved private online provider that 3154 meets the provider qualifications specified in s. 1002.45(2)(a); 3155 the Florida Virtual School as a private paying student; or an 3156 approved online course offered pursuant to s. 1003.499 or s. 3157 1004.0961. 3158 6.e.âFees for nationally standardized, norm-referenced 3159 achievement tests, Advanced Placement Examinations, industry 3160 certification examinations, assessments related to postsecondary 3161 education, or other assessments. 3162 7.f.âContracted services provided by a public school or 3163 school district, including classes. A student who receives 3164 contracted services under this subparagraph sub-subparagraph is 3165 not considered enrolled in a public school for eligibility 3166 purposes as specified in subsection (9) (11) but rather 3167 attending a public school on a part-time basis as authorized 3168 under s. 1002.44. 3169 8.g.âTuition and fees for part-time tutoring services or 3170 fees for services provided by a choice navigator. Such services 3171 must be provided by a person who holds a valid Florida 3172 educatorâs certificate pursuant to s. 1012.56, a person who 3173 holds an adjunct teaching certificate pursuant to s. 1012.57, a 3174 person who has a bachelorâs degree or a graduate degree in the 3175 subject area or related subject area in which instruction is 3176 given, a person who has demonstrated a mastery of subject area 3177 knowledge pursuant to s. 1012.56(5), or a person certified by a 3178 nationally or internationally recognized research-based training 3179 program as approved by the Department of Education. As used in 3180 this paragraph, the term âpart-time tutoring servicesâ does not 3181 qualify as regular school attendance as defined in s. 3182 1003.01(16)(e). 3183 9.âMembership dues and related activity fees for 3184 participation in career and technical student organizations. 3185 (e)âFor students determined eligible pursuant to subsection 3186 (7) paragraph (7)(b), must: 3187 1.âEstablish a process for parents who are in compliance 3188 with subparagraph (7)(b)1. to apply for a new scholarship. New 3189 scholarship applications for the 2025-2026 school year and 3190 thereafter must provide for an application timeline beginning 3191 February 1 of the prior school year and ending April 30 of the 3192 prior school year. The process must require that parents confirm 3193 that the scholarship is being accepted or declined by May 31. 3194 2.âEstablish a process for parents who are in compliance 3195 with paragraph (7)(b) to renew their studentsâ scholarships. 3196 Renewal scholarship applications for the 2025-2026 school year 3197 and thereafter must provide for a renewal timeline beginning 3198 February 1 of the prior school year and ending April 30 of the 3199 prior school year. The process must require that parents confirm 3200 that the scholarship is being renewed or declined by May 31. 3201 1.3.âMaintain a signed agreement from the parent which 3202 constitutes compliance with the attendance requirements under 3203 ss. 1003.01(16) and 1003.21(1). 3204 2.4.âReceive eligible student test scores and, beginning 3205 with the 2027-2028 school year, by August 15, annually report 3206 test scores for students pursuant to subsection (7) paragraph 3207 (7)(b) to a state university pursuant to paragraph (8)(d) 3208 (9)(f). 3209 3.5.âProvide parents with information, guidance, and 3210 support to create and annually update a student learning plan 3211 for their student. The organization must maintain the plan and 3212 allow parents to electronically submit, access, and revise the 3213 plan continuously. 3214 4.6.âUpon submission by the parent of an annual student 3215 learning plan, fund a scholarship for a student determined 3216 eligible. 3217 (f)âMust give first priority to eligible renewal students 3218 who received a scholarship from an eligible nonprofit 3219 scholarship-funding organization during the previous school 3220 year. The eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization 3221 must fully apply and exhaust all funds available under this 3222 section for renewal scholarship awards before awarding any 3223 initial scholarships. 3224 (g)âMust provide a new scholarship to an eligible student 3225 on a first-come, first-served basis unless the student is 3226 seeking priority eligibility pursuant to subsection (3). 3227 (g)(h)âMust refer any student eligible for a scholarship 3228 pursuant to this section who did not receive a renewal or 3229 initial scholarship based solely on the lack of available funds 3230 under this section to another eligible nonprofit scholarship 3231 funding organization that may have funds available. 3232 (i)âMay not restrict or reserve scholarships for use at a 3233 particular eligible private school or provide scholarships to a 3234 child of an owner or operator as defined in subparagraph 3235 (2)(k)1. 3236 (j)âMust allow a student in foster care or out-of-home care 3237 or a dependent child of a parent who is a member of the United 3238 States Armed Forces to apply for a scholarship at any time. 3239 (h)(k)âMust allow an eligible student to attend any 3240 eligible private school and must allow a parent to transfer a 3241 scholarship during a school year to any other eligible private 3242 school of the parentâs choice. 3243 (i)1.(l)1.âMay use eligible contributions received pursuant 3244 to this section and ss. 212.099, 212.1831, and 212.1832 during 3245 the state fiscal year in which such contributions are collected 3246 for administrative expenses if the organization has operated as 3247 an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization for at 3248 least the preceding 3 fiscal years and did not have any findings 3249 of material weakness or material noncompliance in its most 3250 recent audit under paragraph (k) (o) or is in good standing in 3251 each state in which it administers a scholarship program and the 3252 audited financial statements for the preceding 3 fiscal years 3253 are free of material misstatements and going concern issues. 3254 Administrative expenses from eligible contributions may not 3255 exceed 2 3 percent of the total amount of all scholarships and 3256 stipends funded by an eligible scholarship-funding organization 3257 under this chapter. Such administrative expenses must be 3258 reasonable and necessary for the organizationâs management and 3259 distribution of scholarships funded under this chapter. 3260 Administrative expenses may include developing or contracting 3261 with rideshare programs or facilitating carpool strategies for 3262 recipients of a transportation stipend under s. 1002.31(7). No 3263 funds authorized under this subparagraph shall be used for 3264 lobbying or political activity or expenses related to lobbying 3265 or political activity. Up to one-third of the funds authorized 3266 for administrative expenses under this subparagraph may be used 3267 for expenses related to the recruitment of contributions from 3268 taxpayers. An eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 3269 organization may not charge an application fee. 3270 2.âMust expend for annual or partial-year scholarships 100 3271 percent of any eligible contributions from the prior fiscal 3272 year. 3273 3.âMust expend for annual or partial-year scholarships an 3274 amount equal to or greater than 75 percent of all net eligible 3275 contributions, as defined in subsection (2), remaining after 3276 administrative expenses during the state fiscal year in which 3277 such eligible contributions are collected. No more than 25 3278 percent of such net eligible contributions may be carried 3279 forward to the following state fiscal year. All amounts carried 3280 forward, for audit purposes, must be specifically identified for 3281 particular students, by student name and the name of the school 3282 to which the student is admitted, subject to the requirements of 3283 ss. 1002.22 and 1002.221 and 20 U.S.C. s. 1232g, and the 3284 applicable rules and regulations issued pursuant thereto. Any 3285 amounts carried forward shall be expended for annual or partial 3286 year scholarships in the following state fiscal year. Eligible 3287 contributions remaining on June 30 of each year that are in 3288 excess of the 25 percent that may be carried forward shall be 3289 used to provide scholarships to eligible students or transferred 3290 to other eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organizations to 3291 provide scholarships for eligible students. All transferred 3292 funds must be deposited by each eligible nonprofit scholarship 3293 funding organization receiving such funds into its scholarship 3294 account. All transferred amounts received by any eligible 3295 nonprofit scholarship-funding organization must be separately 3296 disclosed in the annual financial audit required under paragraph 3297 (k) (o). 3298 4.âMust, before granting a scholarship for an academic 3299 year, document each scholarship studentâs eligibility for that 3300 academic year. A scholarship-funding organization may not grant 3301 multiyear scholarships in one approval process. 3302 (m)âMust maintain separate accounts for scholarship funds 3303 and operating funds. 3304 (j)(n)âWith the prior approval of the Department of 3305 Education, may transfer funds to another eligible nonprofit 3306 scholarship-funding organization if additional funds are 3307 required to meet scholarship demand at the receiving nonprofit 3308 scholarship-funding organization. A transfer is limited to the 3309 greater of $500,000 or 20 percent of the total contributions 3310 received by the nonprofit scholarship-funding organization 3311 making the transfer. All transferred funds must be deposited by 3312 the receiving nonprofit scholarship-funding organization into 3313 its scholarship accounts. All transferred amounts received by 3314 any nonprofit scholarship-funding organization must be 3315 separately disclosed in the annual financial and compliance 3316 audit required in this section. 3317 (k)(o)âMust provide to the Auditor General and the 3318 Department of Education access to its accounts and records and a 3319 report on the results of an annual financial audit of its 3320 accounts and records conducted by an independent certified 3321 public accountant in accordance with auditing standards 3322 generally accepted in the United States, government auditing 3323 standards, and rules promulgated by the Auditor General. The 3324 audit report must include a report on financial statements 3325 presented in accordance with generally accepted accounting 3326 principles. Audit reports must be provided to the Auditor 3327 General and the Department of Education within 180 days after 3328 completion of the eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 3329 organizationâs fiscal year. The Auditor General shall review all 3330 audit reports submitted pursuant to this paragraph. The Auditor 3331 General shall request any significant items that were omitted in 3332 violation of a rule adopted by the Auditor General. The items 3333 must be provided within 45 days after the date of the request. 3334 If the scholarship-funding organization does not comply with the 3335 Auditor Generalâs request, the Auditor General shall notify the 3336 Legislative Auditing Committee. 3337 (p)âMust prepare and submit quarterly reports to the 3338 Department of Education pursuant to paragraph (9)(i). In 3339 addition, an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization 3340 must submit in a timely manner the verified list of eligible 3341 scholarship students and any information requested by the 3342 Department of Education relating to the scholarship program. 3343 (l)1.a.(q)1.a.âMust participate in the joint development of 3344 agreed-upon procedures during the 2009-2010 state fiscal year. 3345 The agreed-upon procedures must uniformly apply to all private 3346 schools and must determine, at a minimum, whether the private 3347 school has been verified as eligible by the Department of 3348 Education under s. 1002.421; has an adequate accounting system, 3349 system of financial controls, and process for deposit and 3350 classification of scholarship funds; and has properly expended 3351 scholarship funds for education-related expenses. During the 3352 development of the procedures, the participating scholarship 3353 funding organizations shall specify guidelines governing the 3354 materiality of exceptions that may be found during the 3355 accountantâs performance of the procedures. The procedures and 3356 guidelines shall be provided to private schools and the 3357 Commissioner of Education by March 15, 2011. 3358 b.âMust participate in a joint review of the agreed-upon 3359 procedures and guidelines developed under sub-subparagraph a., 3360 by February of each biennium, if the scholarship-funding 3361 organization provided more than $250,000 in scholarship funds 3362 under this chapter during the state fiscal year preceding the 3363 biennial review. If the procedures and guidelines are revised, 3364 the revisions must be provided to private schools and the 3365 Commissioner of Education by March 15 of the year in which the 3366 revisions were completed. The revised agreed-upon procedures and 3367 guidelines shall take effect the subsequent school year. 3368 c.âMust monitor the compliance of a participating private 3369 school with s. 1002.421(9)(p) s. 1002.421(1)(q) if the 3370 scholarship-funding organization provided the majority of the 3371 scholarship funding to the school. For each participating 3372 private school subject to s. 1002.421(9)(p) s. 1002.421(1)(q), 3373 the appropriate scholarship-funding organization shall annually 3374 notify the Commissioner of Education by October 30 of: 3375 (I)âA private schoolâs failure to submit a report required 3376 under s. 1002.421(9)(p) s. 1002.421(1)(q); or 3377 (II)âAny material exceptions set forth in the report 3378 required under s. 1002.421(9)(p) s. 1002.421(1)(q). 3379 2.âMust seek input from the accrediting associations that 3380 are members of the Florida Association of Academic Nonpublic 3381 Schools and the Department of Education when jointly developing 3382 the agreed-upon procedures and guidelines under sub-subparagraph 3383 1.a. and conducting a review of those procedures and guidelines 3384 under sub-subparagraph 1.b. 3385 (m)(r)âMust maintain the surety bond or letter of credit 3386 required by subsection (13) (15). The amount of the surety bond 3387 or letter of credit may be adjusted quarterly to equal the 3388 actual amount of undisbursed funds based upon submission by the 3389 organization of a statement from a certified public accountant 3390 verifying the amount of undisbursed funds. The requirements of 3391 this paragraph are waived if the cost of acquiring a surety bond 3392 or letter of credit exceeds the average 10-year cost of 3393 acquiring a surety bond or letter of credit by 200 percent. The 3394 requirements of this paragraph are waived for a state 3395 university; or an independent college or university which is 3396 eligible to participate in the William L. Boyd, IV, Effective 3397 Access to Student Education Grant Program, located and chartered 3398 in this state, is not for profit, and is accredited by the 3399 Commission on Colleges of the Southern Association of Colleges 3400 and Schools. 3401 (n)(s)âMust provide to the Auditor General any information 3402 or documentation requested in connection with an operational 3403 audit of a scholarship-funding organization conducted pursuant 3404 to s. 11.45. 3405 (o)1.(t)1.âMust develop a purchasing handbook that includes 3406 policies for authorized uses of scholarship funds under 3407 paragraph (d) and s. 1002.394(4)(a). The handbook must include, 3408 at a minimum, a routinely updated list of prohibited items and 3409 services, and items or services that require preauthorization or 3410 additional documentation. Annually, by August 1, 2024, and by 3411 each July 1 thereafter, the purchasing handbook must be provided 3412 to the Commissioner of Education and published on the eligible 3413 nonprofit scholarship-funding organizationâs website. Any 3414 revisions must be provided to the commissioner and published on 3415 the organizationâs website within 30 days after such revisions. 3416 2.âThe organization shall assist the Florida Center for 3417 Students with Unique Abilities established under s. 1004.6495 3418 with the development of purchasing guidelines, which must 3419 include a routinely updated list of prohibited items and 3420 services, and items or services for which preauthorization or 3421 additional documentation is required, for authorized uses of 3422 scholarship funds under s. 1002.394(4)(b) and publish the 3423 guidelines on the organizationâs website. Any approval or denial 3424 of items and services must be consistent with the purchasing 3425 guidelines developed by the center. 3426 3.âIf the organization fails to submit the purchasing 3427 handbook required by subparagraph 1., the Department of 3428 Education may assess a financial penalty, not to exceed $10,000, 3429 as prescribed by State Board of Education rule. This 3430 subparagraph expires July 1, 2026. 3431 (p)(u)âMay permit eligible students to use program funds 3432 for the purposes specified in paragraph (d), as authorized in 3433 the organizationâs purchasing handbook, by paying for the 3434 authorized use directly, then submitting a reimbursement request 3435 to the eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization. 3436 However, an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization 3437 may require the use of an online platform for direct purchases 3438 of products so long as such use does not limit a parentâs choice 3439 of curriculum or academic programs. If a parent purchases a 3440 product identical to one offered by an organizationâs online 3441 platform for a lower price, the organization shall reimburse the 3442 parent the cost of the product. 3443 (v)âMust notify each parent that participation in the 3444 scholarship program does not guarantee enrollment. 3445 (w)âShall commit scholarship funds on behalf of the student 3446 for tuition and fees for which the parent is responsible for 3447 payment at the participating private school before using 3448 scholarship account funds for additional authorized uses under 3449 paragraph (d). 3450 (q)(x)âBeginning September 30, 2023, Must submit to the 3451 department quarterly reports that provide the estimated and 3452 actual amounts of the net eligible contributions, as defined in 3453 subsection (2), and all funds carried forward from the prior 3454 state fiscal year. 3455 (r)(y)âMust establish a process to collect input and 3456 feedback from parents, private schools, and providers before 3457 implementing substantial modifications or enhancements to the 3458 reimbursement process. 3459 3460 Information and documentation provided to the Department of 3461 Education and the Auditor General relating to the identity of a 3462 taxpayer that provides an eligible contribution under this 3463 section shall remain confidential at all times in accordance 3464 with s. 213.053. 3465 (7)âPARENT AND STUDENT RESPONSIBILITIES FOR PROGRAM 3466 PARTICIPATION.â 3467 (a)âA parent who applies for a scholarship whose student 3468 will be enrolled full time in an eligible private school must: 3469 1.âSelect an eligible private school and apply for the 3470 admission of his or her child. 3471 2.âRequest the scholarship by the date established by the 3472 organization in a manner that creates a written or electronic 3473 record of the request and the date of receipt of the request. 3474 3.a.âBeginning with new applications for the 2025-2026 3475 school year and thereafter, notify the organization by a date 3476 set by the organization that the scholarship is being accepted 3477 or declined. 3478 b.âBeginning with renewal applications for the 2025-2026 3479 school year and thereafter, notify the organization by May 31 3480 that the scholarship is being renewed or declined. 3481 4.âInform the applicable school district when the parent 3482 withdraws his or her student from a public school to attend an 3483 eligible private school. 3484 5.âRequire his or her student participating in the program 3485 to remain in attendance at the eligible private school 3486 throughout the school year unless excused by the school for 3487 illness or other good cause and comply with the private schoolâs 3488 published policies. 3489 6.âMeet with the eligible private schoolâs principal or the 3490 principalâs designee to review the schoolâs academic programs 3491 and policies, specialized services, code of student conduct, and 3492 attendance policies before enrollment. 3493 7.âRequire his or her student participating in the program 3494 to take the norm-referenced assessment offered by the 3495 participating private school. The parent may also choose to have 3496 the student participate in the statewide assessments pursuant to 3497 s. 1008.22. If the parent requests that the student 3498 participating in the program take statewide assessments pursuant 3499 to s. 1008.22 and the participating private school has not 3500 chosen to offer and administer the statewide assessments, the 3501 parent is responsible for transporting the student to the 3502 assessment site designated by the school district. 3503 8.âApprove each payment before the scholarship funds may be 3504 deposited by funds transfer. The parent may not designate any 3505 entity or individual associated with the participating private 3506 school as the parentâs attorney in fact to approve a funds 3507 transfer. A participant who fails to comply with this paragraph 3508 forfeits the scholarship. 3509 9.âAuthorize the nonprofit scholarship-funding organization 3510 to access information needed for income eligibility 3511 determination and verification held by other state or federal 3512 agencies, including the Department of Revenue, the Department of 3513 Children and Families, the Department of Education, the 3514 Department of Commerce, and the Agency for Health Care 3515 Administration, for students seeking priority eligibility. 3516 10.âAgree to have the organization commit scholarship funds 3517 on behalf of his or her student for tuition and fees for which 3518 the parent is responsible for payment at the participating 3519 private school before using scholarship account funds for 3520 additional authorized uses under paragraph (6)(d). A parent is 3521 responsible for all eligible expenses in excess of the amount of 3522 the scholarship. 3523 11.âComply with the scholarship application and renewal 3524 processes and requirements established by the organization. 3525 (b)âA parent whose student is participating in the 3526 personalized education program and will not be enrolled full 3527 time in a public or private school must: 3528 1.âApply to an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 3529 organization to participate in the program as a personalized 3530 education student by a date set by the organization. The request 3531 must be communicated directly to the organization in a manner 3532 that creates a written or electronic record of the request and 3533 the date of receipt of the request. Beginning with new and 3534 renewal applications for the 2025-2026 school year and 3535 thereafter, a parent must notify the organization by May 31 that 3536 the scholarship is being accepted, renewed, or declined. 3537 2.âsign an agreement with the organization and annually 3538 submit a sworn compliance statement to the organization to 3539 satisfy or maintain program eligibility, including eligibility 3540 to receive and spend program payments, by: 3541 (a)a.âAffirming that the program funds are used only for 3542 authorized purposes serving the studentâs educational needs, as 3543 described in paragraph (6)(d), and that they will not receive a 3544 payment, refund, or rebate of any funds provided under this 3545 section. 3546 (b)âIf the student is enrolled in Florida Virtual School as 3547 a private paying student, agreeing to have the organization 3548 commit scholarship funds on behalf of his or her student for 3549 tuition and fees for which the parent is responsible for payment 3550 to the Florida Virtual School before using scholarship account 3551 funds for additional uses under paragraph (6)(d). 3552 (c)b.âAffirming that the parent is responsible for all 3553 eligible expenses in excess of the amount of the scholarship and 3554 for the education of his or her student. 3555 (d)c.âSubmitting a student learning plan to the 3556 organization and revising the plan at least annually before 3557 program renewal. 3558 (e)d.âRequiring his or her student to take a nationally 3559 norm-referenced test identified by the Department of Education, 3560 or a statewide assessment under s. 1008.22, and provide 3561 assessment results to the organization before the studentâs 3562 program renewal. 3563 e.âComplying with the scholarship application and renewal 3564 processes and requirements established by the organization. A 3565 student whose participation in the program is not renewed may 3566 continue to spend scholarship funds that are in his or her 3567 account from prior years unless the account must be closed 3568 pursuant to s. 1002.394(5)(a)2. 3569 (f)f.âProcuring the services necessary to educate the 3570 student. When the student receives a scholarship, the district 3571 school board is not obligated to provide the student with a free 3572 appropriate public education. 3573 3574 For purposes of this subsection paragraph, full-time enrollment 3575 does not include enrollment at a private school that addresses 3576 regular and direct contact with teachers through the student 3577 learning plan in accordance with s. 1002.421(9)(i) s. 3578 1002.421(1)(i). 3579 (c)âA parent may not apply for multiple scholarships under 3580 this section and s. 1002.394 for an individual student at the 3581 same time. 3582 3583 An eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization may not 3584 further regulate, exercise control over, or require 3585 documentation beyond the requirements of this subsection unless 3586 the regulation, control, or documentation is necessary for 3587 participation in the program. 3588 (8)âPRIVATE SCHOOL ELIGIBILITY AND OBLIGATIONS.âAn eligible 3589 private school may be sectarian or nonsectarian and must: 3590 (a)âComply with all requirements for private schools 3591 participating in state school choice scholarship programs 3592 pursuant to s. 1002.421. 3593 (b)âProvide to the organization all documentation required 3594 for a studentâs participation, including confirmation of the 3595 studentâs admission to the private school, the private schoolâs 3596 and studentâs fee schedules, and any other information required 3597 by the organization to process scholarship payment pursuant to 3598 paragraph (11)(c). Such information must be provided by the 3599 deadlines established by the organization and in accordance with 3600 the requirements of this section. A student is not eligible to 3601 receive a quarterly scholarship payment if the private school 3602 fails to meet the deadline. 3603 (c)1.âAnnually administer or make provision for students 3604 participating in the scholarship program in grades 3 through 10 3605 to take one of the nationally norm-referenced tests identified 3606 by the department or the statewide assessments pursuant to s. 3607 1008.22. Students with disabilities for whom standardized 3608 testing is not appropriate are exempt from this requirement. A 3609 participating private school must report a studentâs scores to 3610 the parent. A participating private school must annually report 3611 by August 15 the scores of all participating students to a state 3612 university described in paragraph (9)(f). 3613 2.âAdminister the statewide assessments pursuant to s. 3614 1008.22 if a participating private school chooses to offer the 3615 statewide assessments. A participating private school may choose 3616 to offer and administer the statewide assessments to all 3617 students who attend the participating private school in grades 3 3618 through 10 and must submit a request in writing to the 3619 Department of Education by March 1 of each year in order to 3620 administer the statewide assessments in the subsequent school 3621 year. 3622 3623 If a participating private school fails to meet the requirements 3624 of this subsection or s. 1002.421, the commissioner may 3625 determine that the participating private school is ineligible to 3626 participate in the scholarship program. 3627 (9)âDEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION OBLIGATIONS.âThe Department of 3628 Education shall: 3629 (a)âAnnually submit to the department and division, by 3630 March 15, a list of eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 3631 organizations that meet the requirements of paragraph (2)(f) 3632 (2)(g). 3633 (b)âAnnually verify the eligibility of nonprofit 3634 scholarship-funding organizations that meet the requirements of 3635 paragraph (2)(f) (2)(g). 3636 (c)âAnnually verify the eligibility of expenditures as 3637 provided in paragraph (6)(d) or paragraph (6)(i) using the audit 3638 required by paragraph (6)(k) (6)(o). 3639 (d)âNotify eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 3640 organizations of the deadlines for submitting the verified list 3641 of eligible scholarship students; cross-check the verified list 3642 with the public school enrollment lists to avoid duplication; 3643 and, when the Florida Education Finance Program is recalculated, 3644 adjust the amount of state funds allocated to school districts 3645 through the Florida Education Finance Program based upon the 3646 results of the cross-check. 3647 (e)âMaintain and annually publish a list of nationally 3648 norm-referenced tests identified for purposes of satisfying the 3649 testing requirement in subparagraph (8)(c)1. The tests must meet 3650 industry standards of quality in accordance with State Board of 3651 Education rule. 3652 (f)âIssue a project grant award to a state university, to 3653 which participating private schools and eligible nonprofit 3654 scholarship-funding organizations must report the scores of 3655 participating students on the nationally norm-referenced tests 3656 or the statewide assessments administered in grades 3 through 3657 10. The project term is 2 years, and the amount of the project 3658 is up to $250,000 per year. The project grant award must be 3659 reissued in 2-year intervals in accordance with this paragraph. 3660 1.âThe state university must annually report to the 3661 Department of Education on the student performance of 3662 participating students and, beginning with the 2027-2028 school 3663 year, on the performance of personalized education students: 3664 a.âOn a statewide basis. The report shall also include, to 3665 the extent possible, a comparison of scholarship studentsâ 3666 performance to the statewide student performance of public 3667 school students with socioeconomic backgrounds similar to those 3668 of students participating in the scholarship program. To 3669 minimize costs and reduce time required for the state 3670 universityâs analysis and evaluation, the Department of 3671 Education shall coordinate with the state university to provide 3672 data to the state university in order to conduct analyses of 3673 matched students from public school assessment data and 3674 calculate control group student performance using an agreed-upon 3675 methodology with the state university; and 3676 b.âOn an individual school basis for students enrolled full 3677 time in a private school. The annual report must include student 3678 performance for each participating private school in which 3679 enrolled students in the private school participated in a 3680 scholarship program under this section or s. 1002.394(12)(a) in 3681 the prior school year. The report shall be according to each 3682 participating private school, and for participating students, in 3683 which there are at least 30 participating students who have 3684 scores for tests administered. If the state university 3685 determines that the 30-participating-student cell size may be 3686 reduced without disclosing personally identifiable information, 3687 as described in 34 C.F.R. s. 99.12, of a participating student, 3688 the state university may reduce the participating-student cell 3689 size, but the cell size must not be reduced to less than 10 3690 participating students. The department shall provide each 3691 participating private schoolâs prior school yearâs student 3692 enrollment information to the state university no later than 3693 June 15 of each year, or as requested by the state university. 3694 2.âThe sharing and reporting of student performance data 3695 under this paragraph must be in accordance with requirements of 3696 ss. 1002.22 and 1002.221 and 20 U.S.C. s. 1232g, the Family 3697 Educational Rights and Privacy Act, and the applicable rules and 3698 regulations issued pursuant thereto, and shall be for the sole 3699 purpose of creating the annual report required by subparagraph 3700 1. All parties must preserve the confidentiality of such 3701 information as required by law. The annual report must not 3702 disaggregate data to a level that will identify individual 3703 participating schools, except as required under sub-subparagraph 3704 1.b., or disclose the academic level of individual students. 3705 3.âThe annual report required by subparagraph 1. shall be 3706 published by the Department of Education on its website. 3707 (g)âNotify an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 3708 organization of any of the organizationâs identified students 3709 who are receiving educational scholarships pursuant to this 3710 chapter. 3711 (h)âNotify an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 3712 organization of any of the organizationâs identified students 3713 who are receiving tax credit scholarships from other eligible 3714 nonprofit scholarship-funding organizations. 3715 (i)âRequire quarterly reports by an eligible nonprofit 3716 scholarship-funding organization regarding the number of 3717 students participating in the program; the private schools at 3718 which the students are enrolled; the number of scholarship 3719 applications received, the number of applications processed 3720 within 30 days after receipt, and the number of incomplete 3721 applications received; data related to reimbursement 3722 submissions, including the average number of days for a 3723 reimbursement to be reviewed and the average number of days for 3724 a reimbursement to be approved; any parent input and feedback 3725 collected regarding the program; and any other information 3726 deemed necessary by the Department of Education. 3727 (e)(j)âProvide a process to match the direct certification 3728 list with the scholarship application data submitted by any 3729 nonprofit scholarship-funding organization eligible to receive 3730 the 3 percent 3-percent administrative allowance under paragraph 3731 (6)(i) (6)(l). 3732 (f)(k)âNotify each school district of the full-time 3733 equivalent student consensus estimate of scholarship students 3734 developed pursuant to s. 216.136(4)(a). 3735 (10)âSCHOOL DISTRICT OBLIGATIONS; PARENTAL OPTIONS.â 3736 (a)âUpon the request of any eligible nonprofit scholarship 3737 funding organization, a school district shall inform all 3738 households within the district receiving free or reduced-priced 3739 meals under the National School Lunch Act of their eligibility 3740 to apply for a tax credit scholarship. The form of such notice 3741 shall be provided by the eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 3742 organization, and the district shall include the provided form, 3743 if requested by the organization, in any normal correspondence 3744 with eligible households. If an eligible nonprofit scholarship 3745 funding organization requests a special communication to be 3746 issued to households within the district receiving free or 3747 reduced-price meals under the National School Lunch Act, the 3748 organization shall reimburse the district for the cost of 3749 postage. Such notice is limited to once a year. 3750 (b)âUpon the request of the Department of Education, a 3751 school district shall coordinate with the department to provide 3752 to a participating private school the statewide assessments 3753 administered under s. 1008.22 and any related materials for 3754 administering the assessments. A school district is responsible 3755 for implementing test administrations at a participating private 3756 school, including the: 3757 1.âProvision of training for participating private school 3758 staff on test security and assessment administration procedures; 3759 2.âDistribution of testing materials to a participating 3760 private school; 3761 3.âRetrieval of testing materials from a participating 3762 private school; 3763 4.âProvision of the required format for a participating 3764 private school to submit information to the district for test 3765 administration and enrollment purposes; and 3766 5.âProvision of any required assistance, monitoring, or 3767 investigation at a participating private school. 3768 (9)(11)âSCHOLARSHIP AMOUNT AND PAYMENT.â 3769 (a)âThe scholarship amount provided to any student for any 3770 single school year by an eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 3771 organization from eligible contributions shall be for total 3772 costs authorized under paragraph (6)(c) (6)(d), not to exceed 3773 annual limits., which shall be determined as follows: 3774 1.âFor a student who received a scholarship in the 2018 3775 2019 school year, who remains eligible, and who is enrolled in 3776 an eligible private school, the amount shall be the greater 3777 amount calculated pursuant to subparagraph 2. or a percentage of 3778 the unweighted FTE funding amount for the 2018-2019 state fiscal 3779 year and thereafter as follows: 3780 a.âEighty-eight percent for a student enrolled in 3781 kindergarten through grade 5. 3782 b.âNinety-two percent for a student enrolled in grade 6 3783 through grade 8. 3784 c.âNinety-six percent for a student enrolled in grade 9 3785 through grade 12. 3786 2.âFor students initially eligible in the 2019-2020 school 3787 year or thereafter, the calculated amount for a student to 3788 attend an eligible private school shall be calculated in 3789 accordance with s. 1002.394(12)(a). 3790 (b)âPayment of the scholarship by the eligible nonprofit 3791 scholarship-funding organization shall be by funds transfer, 3792 including, but not limited to, debit cards, electronic payment 3793 cards, or any other means of payment that the department deems 3794 to be commercially viable or cost-effective. An eligible 3795 nonprofit scholarship-funding organization shall ensure that the 3796 parent has approved a funds transfer before any scholarship 3797 funds are deposited. 3798 (c)âIf a scholarship student is attending an eligible 3799 private school full time, the initial payment shall be made 3800 after the organizationâs verification of admission acceptance, 3801 and subsequent payments shall be made upon verification of 3802 continued enrollment and attendance at the eligible private 3803 school. Payments shall be made within 7 business days after 3804 approval by the parent pursuant to paragraph (7)(a) and the 3805 private school pursuant to paragraph (8)(b). 3806 (d)âPayment of the scholarship shall be made by the 3807 eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization no less 3808 frequently than on a quarterly basis. 3809 (e)âAn eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization 3810 may not transfer any funds to an account of a student determined 3811 eligible under this section which has a balance in excess of 3812 $24,000. 3813 (b)(f)âA scholarship awarded to an eligible student shall 3814 remain in force until: 3815 1.âThe organization determines that the student is not 3816 eligible for program renewal; 3817 2.âThe Commissioner of Education suspends or revokes 3818 program participation or use of funds; 3819 3.âThe studentâs parent has forfeited participation in the 3820 program for failure to comply with subsection (7); 3821 4.âThe student who uses the scholarship for full-time 3822 tuition and fees at an eligible private school pursuant to 3823 paragraph (7)(a) enrolls full time in a public school. However, 3824 if a student enters a Department of Juvenile Justice detention 3825 center for a period of no more than 21 days, the student is not 3826 considered to have returned to a public school on a full-time 3827 basis for that purpose; or 3828 5.âThe student graduates from high school, completes a home 3829 education program as defined in the studentâs personalized 3830 education plan, or attains 21 years of age, whichever occurs 3831 first. 3832 (g)âReimbursements for program expenditures may continue 3833 until the account balance is expended or remaining funds have 3834 reverted to the state. 3835 (c)(h)âA studentâs scholarship account must be closed and 3836 any remaining funds shall revert to the state or organization, 3837 as applicable, after: 3838 1.âDenial or revocation of program eligibility by the 3839 commissioner for fraud or abuse, including, but not limited to, 3840 the student or studentâs parent accepting any payment, refund, 3841 or rebate, in any manner, from a provider of any services 3842 received pursuant to paragraph (6)(d); 3843 2.âOne fiscal year Two consecutive fiscal years in which an 3844 account has been inactive; or 3845 3.âThe student remains unenrolled in an eligible private 3846 school for 30 days while receiving a scholarship that requires 3847 full-time enrollment; or 3848 4.âA studentâs scholarship no longer remains in force due 3849 to any of the reasons provided in paragraph (b). 3850 3851 An organization must report to the Department of Education the 3852 total number of scholarship accounts that were closed pursuant 3853 to this paragraph and the amount of funds by account that 3854 reverted to the organization. 3855 (d)(i)âMoneys received pursuant to this section do not 3856 constitute taxable income to the qualified student or the parent 3857 of the qualified student. 3858 (13)(15)âNONPROFIT SCHOLARSHIP-FUNDING ORGANIZATIONS; 3859 APPLICATION.âIn order to participate in the scholarship program 3860 created under this section, a charitable organization that seeks 3861 to be a nonprofit scholarship-funding organization must submit 3862 an application for initial approval or renewal to the Office of 3863 Independent Education and Parental Choice. Charitable 3864 organizations may apply at any time to participate in the 3865 program. 3866 (e)âIf the State Board of Education disapproves the renewal 3867 of a nonprofit scholarship-funding organization, the 3868 organization must notify the affected eligible students and 3869 parents of the decision within 15 days after disapproval. An 3870 eligible student affected by the disapproval of an 3871 organizationâs participation remains eligible under this section 3872 until the end of the school year in which the organization was 3873 disapproved. The student must apply and be accepted by another 3874 eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization for the 3875 upcoming school year. The student shall be given priority in 3876 accordance with s. 1002.421(2)(d)3. paragraph (6)(g). 3877 Section 7.âParagraph (l) of subsection (4) of section 3878 1003.485, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3879 1003.485âThe New Worlds Reading Initiative.â 3880 (4)âADMINISTRATOR RESPONSIBILITIES.âThe administrator 3881 shall: 3882 (l)âExpend eligible contributions received only for the 3883 purchase and delivery of books and to implement the requirements 3884 of this section, as well as for administrative expenses not to 3885 exceed 2 percent of total eligible contributions. 3886 Notwithstanding s. 1002.395(6)(i)3. s. 1002.395(6)(l)3., the 3887 administrator may carry forward up to 25 percent of eligible 3888 contributions made before January 1 of each state fiscal year 3889 and 100 percent of eligible contributions made on or after 3890 January 1 of each state fiscal year to the following state 3891 fiscal year for purposes authorized by this subsection. Any 3892 eligible contributions in excess of the allowable carry forward 3893 not used to provide additional books throughout the year to 3894 eligible students shall revert to the state treasury. 3895 Section 8.âParagraph (d) of subsection (5) of section 3896 1008.25, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 3897 1008.25âPublic school student progression; student support; 3898 coordinated screening and progress monitoring; reporting 3899 requirements.â 3900 (5)âREADING DEFICIENCY AND PARENTAL NOTIFICATION.â 3901 (d)âThe parent of any student who exhibits a substantial 3902 deficiency in reading, as described in paragraph (a), must be 3903 immediately notified in writing of the following: 3904 1.âThat his or her child has been identified as having a 3905 substantial deficiency in reading, including a description and 3906 explanation, in terms understandable to the parent, of the exact 3907 nature of the studentâs difficulty in learning and lack of 3908 achievement in reading. 3909 2.âA description of the current services that are provided 3910 to the child. 3911 3.âA description of the proposed intensive interventions 3912 and supports that will be provided to the child that are 3913 designed to remediate the identified area of reading deficiency. 3914 4.âThe student progression requirements under paragraph 3915 (2)(h) and that if the childâs reading deficiency is not 3916 remediated by the end of grade 3, the child must be retained 3917 unless he or she is exempt from mandatory retention for good 3918 cause. 3919 5.âStrategies, including multisensory strategies and 3920 programming, through a read-at-home plan the parent can use in 3921 helping his or her child succeed in reading. The read-at-home 3922 plan must provide access to the resources identified in 3923 paragraph (e). 3924 6.âThat the statewide, standardized English Language Arts 3925 assessment is not the sole determiner of promotion and that 3926 additional evaluations, portfolio reviews, and assessments are 3927 available to the child to assist parents and the school district 3928 in knowing when a child is reading at or above grade level and 3929 ready for grade promotion. 3930 7.âThe districtâs specific criteria and policies for a 3931 portfolio as provided in subparagraph (7)(b)4. and the evidence 3932 required for a student to demonstrate mastery of Floridaâs 3933 academic standards for English Language Arts. A school must 3934 immediately begin collecting evidence for a portfolio when a 3935 student in grade 3 is identified as being at risk of retention 3936 or upon the request of the parent, whichever occurs first. 3937 8.âThe districtâs specific criteria and policies for 3938 midyear promotion. Midyear promotion means promotion of a 3939 retained student at any time during the year of retention once 3940 the student has demonstrated ability to read at grade level. 3941 9.âInformation about the studentâs eligibility for the New 3942 Worlds Reading Initiative under s. 1003.485 and the New Worlds 3943 Scholarship Accounts under s. 1002.411 and information on parent 3944 training modules and other reading engagement resources 3945 available through the initiative. 3946 3947 After initial notification, the school shall apprise the parent 3948 at least monthly of the studentâs progress in response to the 3949 intensive interventions and supports. Such communications must 3950 be in writing and must explain any additional interventions or 3951 supports that will be implemented to accelerate the studentâs 3952 progress if the interventions and supports already being 3953 implemented have not resulted in improvement. Upon the request 3954 of the parent, the teacher or school administrator shall meet to 3955 discuss the studentâs progress. The parent may request more 3956 frequent notification of the studentâs progress, more frequent 3957 interventions or supports, and earlier implementation of the 3958 additional interventions or supports described in the initial 3959 notification. 3960 Section 9.âSection 1010.305, Florida Statutes, is amended 3961 to read: 3962 1010.305âAudit of student enrollment.â 3963 (1)âThe Auditor General shall annually periodically examine 3964 the records of school districts, eligible nonprofit scholarship 3965 funding organizations as defined in s. 1002.421, and other 3966 agencies as appropriate, to determine compliance with law and 3967 State Board of Education rules relating to the classification, 3968 assignment, and verification of full-time equivalent student 3969 enrollment and student transportation reported under the Florida 3970 Education Finance Program. 3971 (2)âIf it is determined that the approved criteria and 3972 procedures for the placement of students and the conduct of 3973 programs have not been followed by the district or eligible 3974 nonprofit scholarship-funding organization, appropriate 3975 adjustments in the full-time equivalent student count for that 3976 district or eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization 3977 must be made, and any excess funds must be deducted from 3978 subsequent allocations of state funds to that district or 3979 eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization. As provided 3980 for by rule, if errors in a specific program of a district or 3981 eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization recur in 3982 consecutive years due to lack of corrective action by the 3983 district or eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organization, 3984 adjustments may be made based upon statistical estimates of 3985 error projected to the overall district or scholarship program. 3986 Section 10.âSubsection (4) of section 1011.61, Florida 3987 Statutes, is amended to read: 3988 1011.61âDefinitions.âNotwithstanding the provisions of s. 3989 1000.21, the following terms are defined as follows for the 3990 purposes of the Florida Education Finance Program: 3991 (4)âThe âFlorida Education Finance Programâ includes all 3992 programs and costs as provided in ss. 1003.03, 1011.62, 1011.68, 3993 and 1011.685, 1011.687, and 1011.689, as applicable. 3994 Section 11.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1), paragraph (a) 3995 of subsection (15), and subsections (16) and (19) of section 3996 1011.62, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 3997 1011.62âFunds for operation of schools.âIf the annual 3998 allocation from the Florida Education Finance Program to each 3999 district for operation of schools is not determined in the 4000 annual appropriations act or the substantive bill implementing 4001 the annual appropriations act, it shall be determined as 4002 follows: 4003 (1)âCOMPUTATION OF THE BASE FLORIDA EDUCATION FINANCE 4004 PROGRAM.âThe following procedure shall be followed in 4005 determining the base Florida Education Finance Program funds for 4006 each district: 4007 (a)âDetermination of full-time equivalent membership.â 4008 1.âDuring the fiscal year, including scheduled 4009 intersessions of a year-round school program during the fiscal 4010 year, each district shall complete full-time equivalent surveys 4011 by aggregating the full-time equivalent student membership of 4012 each program by school. The department shall establish the 4013 number and interval of membership calculations. The districtâs 4014 full-time equivalent membership shall be computed and currently 4015 maintained in accordance with regulations of the commissioner. 4016 2.âAll final reported full-time equivalent survey data must 4017 include the unduplicated count of both school district full-time 4018 equivalent students and full-time equivalent Family Empowerment 4019 Scholarship students. 4020 (15)âTOTAL ALLOCATION OF STATE FUNDS TO EACH DISTRICT.âThe 4021 total annual state allocation to each district for current 4022 operation for the Florida Education Finance Program shall be 4023 distributed to districts pursuant to s. 1011.66 and based on the 4024 results of the full-time equivalent membership surveys 4025 established in paragraph (1)(a). 4026 (a)âWhen the Florida Education Finance Program allocation 4027 is recalculated, if the gross state Florida Education Finance 4028 Program funds are not sufficient to pay the state requirement in 4029 full, the department shall prorate the available state funds to 4030 each district in the following manner: 4031 1.âTo calculate the gross state and local Florida Education 4032 Finance Program funding, add the base Florida Education Finance 4033 Program and the categorical funds, except for the categorical 4034 funding provided in subsection (16) and s. 1011.685. 4035 2.âTo calculate the gross state Florida Education Finance 4036 Program funding, subtract the required local effort in 4037 subsection (4) from the gross and local Florida Education 4038 Finance Program funding. 4039 3.âTo determine the amount that must be prorated among all 4040 school districts, subtract the gross state Florida Education 4041 Finance Program and any prior year adjustments pursuant to 4042 paragraph (b) from the corresponding amount of state funds 4043 appropriated in the General Appropriations Act. 4044 4.âEach school districtâs amount of the proration is 4045 calculated based on its proportionate share of the gross state 4046 and local Florida Education Finance Program funding. 4047 (16)âSTATE-FUNDED DISCRETIONARY SUPPLEMENT.â 4048 (a)âThe state-funded discretionary supplement is created to 4049 fund the nonvoted discretionary millage for operations pursuant 4050 to s. 1011.71(1) and (3) for students awarded a Family 4051 Empowerment Scholarship in accordance with s. 1002.394. To 4052 calculate the state-funded discretionary supplement for 4053 inclusion in the amount of the scholarship funding: 4054 1.âFor fiscal year 2023-2024, multiply the maximum 4055 allowable nonvoted discretionary millage for operations pursuant 4056 to s. 1011.71(1) and (3) by the value of 96 percent of the 4057 current yearâs taxable value for school purposes for the school 4058 district where the student is reported for purposes of the 4059 Florida Education Finance Program as appropriated in the General 4060 Appropriations Act; divide the result by the school districtâs 4061 total unweighted full-time equivalent membership as appropriated 4062 in the General Appropriations Act; and multiply the result by 4063 the total unweighted full-time equivalent membership associated 4064 with the number of Family Empowerment Scholarship students 4065 included in the school districtâs total unweighted full-time 4066 equivalent membership. A base amount as specified in the General 4067 Appropriations Act shall be added to this amount for purposes of 4068 calculating the total amount of the supplement. 4069 2.âBeginning in fiscal year 2024-2025 and thereafter, 4070 multiply the maximum allowable nonvoted discretionary millage 4071 for operations pursuant to s. 1011.71(1) and (3) by the value of 4072 96 percent of the current yearâs taxable value for school 4073 purposes for the school district where the student is reported 4074 for purposes of the Florida Education Finance Program as 4075 appropriated in the General Appropriations Act; divide the 4076 result by the school districtâs total unweighted full-time 4077 equivalent membership as appropriated in the General 4078 Appropriations Act; and multiply the result by the total 4079 unweighted full-time equivalent membership associated with the 4080 number of Family Empowerment Scholarship students. The prior 4081 yearâs base amount shall be adjusted based on changes in the 4082 eligible number of unweighted full-time equivalent membership 4083 associated with the number of Family Empowerment Scholarship 4084 students. 4085 (b)âThe state-funded discretionary supplement shall be 4086 recalculated during the fiscal year based on actual full-time 4087 equivalent student membership. 4088 (19)âEDUCATIONAL ENROLLMENT STABILIZATION PROGRAM.â 4089 (a)âThe educational enrollment stabilization program is 4090 created to provide supplemental state funds as needed to 4091 maintain the stability of the operations of public schools in 4092 each school district and to protect districts, including charter 4093 schools, from financial instability as a result of changes in 4094 full-time equivalent student enrollment throughout the school 4095 year. 4096 (b)âThe Legislature shall annually appropriate funds in the 4097 General Appropriations Act to the Department of Education for 4098 this program in an amount necessary to maintain a projected 4099 minimum balance of $250 million at the beginning of the upcoming 4100 fiscal year. The Department of Education shall use funds as 4101 appropriated to ensure that based on each recalculation of the 4102 Florida Education Finance Program pursuant to paragraph (1)(a), 4103 a school districtâs funds per unweighted full-time equivalent 4104 student are not less than the greater of either the school 4105 districtâs funds per unweighted full-time equivalent student as 4106 appropriated in the General Appropriations Act or the school 4107 districtâs funds per unweighted full-time equivalent student as 4108 recalculated based upon the receipt of the certified taxable 4109 value for school purposes pursuant to s. 1011.62(4). 4110 (c)âNotwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351, 4111 the unexpended balance of funds appropriated pursuant to this 4112 subsection which is not disbursed by June 30 of the fiscal year 4113 in which the funds are appropriated may be carried forward for 4114 up to 10 years after the effective date of the original 4115 appropriation. 4116 Section 12.âParagraph (l) of subsection (2) of section 4117 11.45, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (o) is added 4118 to that subsection, to read: 4119 11.45âDefinitions; duties; authorities; reports; rules.â 4120 (2)âDUTIES.âThe Auditor General shall: 4121 (l)âAt least once every 3 years, conduct operational audits 4122 of the accounts and records of eligible nonprofit scholarship 4123 funding organizations receiving eligible contributions under s. 4124 1002.395, including any contracts for services with related 4125 entities, to determine compliance with the provisions of that 4126 section. Such audits shall include, but not be limited to, a 4127 determination of the eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding 4128 organizationâs compliance with s. 1002.395(6)(i), including 4129 whether the organizationâs expenditures are reasonable and 4130 necessary s. 1002.395(6)(l). The Auditor General shall provide 4131 its report on the results of the audits to the Governor, the 4132 President of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of 4133 Representatives, the Chief Financial Officer, and the 4134 Legislative Auditing Committee, within 30 days of completion of 4135 the audit. 4136 (o)âBeginning July 1, 2027, annually conduct an audit of 4137 records of eligible nonprofit scholarship-funding organizations 4138 regarding the background screening results in s. 1002.421(8)(a). 4139 4140 The Auditor General shall perform his or her duties 4141 independently but under the general policies established by the 4142 Legislative Auditing Committee. This subsection does not limit 4143 the Auditor Generalâs discretionary authority to conduct other 4144 audits or engagements of governmental entities as authorized in 4145 subsection (3). 4146 Section 13.âParagraph (c) of subsection (7) of section 4147 212.099, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4148 212.099âCredit for contributions to eligible nonprofit 4149 scholarship-funding organizations.â 4150 (7) 4151 (c)âThe organization may, subject to the limitations of s. 4152 1002.395(6)(i)1. s. 1002.395(6)(l)1., use eligible contributions 4153 received during the state fiscal year in which such 4154 contributions are collected for administrative expenses. 4155 Section 14.âSubsection (6) of section 402.22, Florida 4156 Statutes, is amended to read: 4157 402.22âEducation program for students who reside in 4158 residential care facilities operated by the Department of 4159 Children and Families or the Agency for Persons with 4160 Disabilities.â 4161 (6)âNotwithstanding the provisions of s. 1001.42(4)(m), the 4162 educational program at the Marianna Sunland Center in Jackson 4163 County shall be operated by the Department of Education, either 4164 directly or through grants or contractual agreements with other 4165 public educational agencies. The annual state allocation to any 4166 such agency shall be computed pursuant to s. 1011.62(1), (2), 4167 and (17) (18) and allocated in the amount that would have been 4168 provided the local school district in which the residential 4169 facility is located. 4170 Section 15.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6) of section 4171 1002.45, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 4172 1002.45âVirtual instruction programs.â 4173 (6)âVIRTUAL INSTRUCTION PROGRAM AND VIRTUAL CHARTER SCHOOL 4174 FUNDING.â 4175 (b)âStudents enrolled in a virtual instruction program 4176 shall be funded in the Florida Education Finance Program as 4177 provided in the General Appropriations Act. The calculation to 4178 determine the amount of funds for each student through the 4179 Florida Education Finance Program shall include the sum of the 4180 basic amount for current operations established in s. 4181 1011.62(1)(n) and all categorical programs except for the 4182 categorical programs established in ss. 1011.62(7) and, (12), 4183 and (16), 1011.68, and 1011.685, and 1011.687. Students residing 4184 outside of the school district reporting the full-time 4185 equivalent virtual student shall be funded from state funds 4186 only. 4187 Section 16.âSubsection (3) of section 1003.4935, Florida 4188 Statutes, is amended to read: 4189 1003.4935âMiddle grades career and professional academy 4190 courses and career-themed courses.â 4191 (3)âCAPE industry certifications offered in the middle 4192 grades that are included on the CAPE Industry Certification 4193 Funding List, if earned by students, are eligible for additional 4194 funding pursuant to s. 1011.62(16) s. 1011.62(17). 4195 Section 17.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) and paragraph 4196 (b) of subsection (3) of section 1010.20, Florida Statutes, are 4197 amended to read: 4198 1010.20âCost accounting and reporting for school 4199 districts.â 4200 (2)âCOST REPORTING.â 4201 (a)âEach district shall report on a district-aggregate 4202 basis expenditures for inservice training pursuant to s. 4203 1011.62(3) and for categorical programs as provided in s. 4204 1011.62(18). 4205 (3)âPROGRAM EXPENDITURE REQUIREMENTS.â 4206 (b)âFunds for inservice training established in s. 4207 1011.62(3) and for categorical programs established in s. 4208 1011.62(17) s. 1011.62(18) shall be expended for the costs of 4209 the identified programs as provided by law and in accordance 4210 with the rules of the State Board of Education. 4211 Section 18.â(1)âThe Legislature finds that the educational 4212 scholarship programs created pursuant to chapter 1002, Florida 4213 Statutes, provide unprecedented school choice in this state and 4214 are central to parent empowerment. 4215 (a)âThe Legislature further finds that to protect universal 4216 school choice within this state, it is critical to remain good 4217 stewards of taxpayer funds, including eligible contributions 4218 made to scholarship programs. This state is implementing the 4219 nationâs largest school choice program, and it must be 4220 safeguarded. 4221 (b)âTo improve the efficiency, accountability, and 4222 transparency of the scholarship programs, a single entity that 4223 can be held directly accountable to the state must be 4224 responsible for the implementation of the programs. 4225 (c)âTherefore, the Legislature determines that it is in the 4226 best interest of this state for the Department of Education to 4227 implement the scholarship programs. 4228 (2)âThe Department of Education must provide a report 4229 outlining its recommendations for the implementation of the 4230 educational scholarship programs, with such implementation set 4231 to begin in the 2028-2029 school year. 4232 (3)âThe departmentâs recommendations must address each of 4233 the following program components: 4234 (a)âThe application process. 4235 (b)âThe enrollment and verification process. 4236 (c)âStudent account management and requirements. 4237 (d)âThe payment or reimbursement process. 4238 (e)âCommunication with parents regarding the different 4239 scholarship programs and how to apply to a scholarship program. 4240 (f)âAssistance for parents with scholarship-related 4241 questions and issues. 4242 (g)âAdministration of the contributions received pursuant 4243 to s. 1002.395(5), Florida Statutes. 4244 (4)âThe department may, for any or all of the program 4245 components, recommend itself or any other state agency or public 4246 entity, such as school districts or educational consortiums, for 4247 implementation of the component. Any contract to implement a 4248 component must be awarded pursuant to chapter 287, Florida 4249 Statutes, through a competitive procurement process. At a 4250 minimum, the department must include an outline of the 4251 requirements for each program component which includes all of 4252 the following information, as applicable: 4253 (a)âAn estimate of recurring and nonrecurring costs, 4254 including an estimate of any administrative costs the department 4255 deems reasonable and necessary, and for what purposes the 4256 administrative funds may be used. 4257 (b)âA description, justification, and detailed cost 4258 breakdown of any additional resources that the department 4259 requires to fully implement the program component. 4260 (c)âThe business, functional, and technical requirements 4261 for the program component. 4262 (d)âA list of roles and responsibilities for the program 4263 component which delineates the functionality that will be 4264 provided by the department or other entity, as applicable. 4265 (e)âA proposed implementation timeline that identifies 4266 major milestones, dependencies, and the estimated completion 4267 dates for the program component. 4268 (f)âA framework establishing a communication structure and 4269 accountability measures which will ensure coordinated, 4270 efficient, and transparent interaction among each project 4271 component. 4272 (g)âAn outcome-based contracting framework that will be 4273 used to measure each contractâs success against specific, 4274 objective performance metrics and desired outcomes. This 4275 framework may incorporate a system of rewards for exceeding 4276 performance goals, and penalties for failing to meet them. 4277 (5)âIf the department recommends administration of any 4278 project component by a scholarship-funding organization, the 4279 department must include recommendations for eligibility 4280 requirements of the scholarship-funding organizations and any 4281 other changes to the application process or other procedural 4282 requirements it recommends. 4283 (6)âThe department shall also include in its report a plan 4284 to ensure that the results from required background screening 4285 for education providers who are licensed or who are exempt from 4286 licensure through the Department of Children and Families are 4287 shared with the Department of Education. 4288 (7)âThe department must submit the report to the Governor, 4289 the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of 4290 Representatives no later than December 1, 2026, and must include 4291 any statutory changes that may be necessary to implement the 4292 departmentâs recommendations. 4293 (8)âThis section expires July 1, 2027. 4294 Section 19.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.